<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>aur teri mulli maa ne apni fuddi di hai tere chaar mamujaan ko...tu unme se kiski aulad hai tujhe nahin pata hoga...hahahahahahahah....</comment>

<comment>Yep, nothing better can be expected from muslims anyway. You can use Hindu name but your views coming from Koran will never change.What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>abe paki bhadwe...aa gaya tu maa chudane porkistan se??</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Mohammad = Child molester.</comment>

<comment> RSS never indulge in petty issues.......Hathi chalte hai.........Kutte Bhunkate hai.....</comment>

<comment>RSS is probably the only organisation in India which can change our country. It is a call of high order .It needs a leader who understands our heritage and legacy. And has a vision for future. Our past is a complex mixture of spirituality,mythology and literature. The leader should know what is what. Only one like Swami Vivekananda will fit the bill. When RSS gets such a leader, India will move towards her glorious future. The wait may be long.</comment>

<comment>The immortal patriot Swami Vivekananda would have been the first one to order the closing of RSS and all such organisations who are hell-bent on destroying this ancient motherland of ours..Don't drag such souls into the murky world of ur fake sadhus,sadhvis and swamis. People like Swami Vivekananda are beyond religions and castes and all such petty divides that you people glorify...u can never represent my Hinduism..Its much much above a bunch of illiterate misinformed blood-thirsty youths brandishing swords with the name of Lord Rama on their lips..and intent on spilling blood of anybody who disagrees with their diktat...be it a Hindu, Muslim or of any other religion..Shame on u and ur supporters</comment>

<comment>Baccha, stop blaming RSS etc. and first learn to admit that muslims are spreading terror worldwide, 99.999% of terrorists are muslims and they will do exactly what their Koranic Satanic verses tells them through their mullah is to blow themselves so that they can get 72 whores in hell.</comment>

<comment>Neither Vedas nor Koran or Bible are message of GOD but written only by vested interests humans only to discriminate human from human and created more trouble for man kind. That way, animals are better than man having no religions but live with love and compassion except their fight for foods and sex.</comment>

<comment>I think all people irrespective of religion are wise enough to know that killing another Human being is a great sin.There is something seriously wrong about killing people for religious reasons. After all none of us are God, to judge people...</comment>

<comment>From  where the Aryans invades came into India, that is the way out for them if they cant get along with other invades.Half trouser idiots</comment>

<comment>Shit man....you want to use your hindu name and blame others.All muslims promote such statements to eye wash people that they are brothers with all but as soon as they are in majority they show their true colors of terrorism. India was divided. By who? Muslims off course. In India a Hindu majority country the only state where muslims are majority...what do they do..they butcher and kick hindus out of J&K. So dont even tell me what muslims do. Well we all know they are like our brothers when they fight the war of independence and then divided India the moment 1947 came.</comment>

<comment>Dear RSS, human life or cow life, which is more sacred according to Vedas? Just a dumb question.</comment>

<comment>In our country if a person save tiger then he is a social worker, if a person save dog then he is a animal lover but if a person save cows he is a hindu fanatic... why ???</comment>

<comment>Because to save tigers we don't kill other humans, but it seems to be happening while saving the cow. Hindu or not, who cares. Fanatic for sure.</comment>

<comment>In UP villages  thieves are beaten to death... n JUST hope u  r aware of what happened with Prashant in Karnataka...</comment>

<comment>i hope you bitched about massacre of innocent kashmiri hindus the same way you are bitching here...i ll be impressed dude...</comment>

<comment>so kashmiri hdus were "massacred" on the issue of cows ?</comment>

<comment>No, Kashmiri Hindus were massacred in the name of Allah who told you through his mullah that it is ok to kill Khafirs. All over the world the only thing muslims know is to massacre. Want me to put the facts here or you just going to sing your song that your religion is of peace (but spreads terror).</comment>

<comment>Well done RSS,keep it upThe Shoe Bomber was a MuslimThe Beltway Snipers were MuslimsThe Fort Hood Shooter was a MuslimThe underwear Bomber was a MuslimThe U-S.S. Cole Bombers were MuslimsThe Madrid Train Bombers were MuslimsThe Bafi Nightclub Bombers were MuslimsThe London Subway Bombers were MuslimsThe Moscow Theatre Attackers were MuslimsThe Boston Marathon Bombers were MuslimsThe Pan-Am flight #93 Bombers were MuslimsThe Air France Entebbe Hijackers were MuslimsThe Iranian Embassy Takeover, was by MuslimsThe Beirut U.S. Embassy bombers were MuslimsThe Libyan U.S. Embassy Attack was by MusiimsThe Buenos Aires Suicide Bombers were MuslimsThe Israeli Olympic Team Attackers were MuslimsThe Kenyan U.S, Embassy Bombers were MuslimsThe Saudi, Khobar Towers Bombers were MuslimsThe Beirut Marine Barracks bombers were MuslimsThe Besian Russian School Attackers were MuslimsThe first World Trade Center Bombers were MuslimsThe Bombay & Mumbai India Attackers were MuslimsThe Achille Lauro Cruise Ship Hijackers were MuslimsThe September 11th 2001 Airline Hijackers were Muslims'Think of it:Buddhists living with Hindus = No ProblemHindus living with Christians = No ProblemHindus living with Jews = No ProblemChristians living with Shintos = No ProblemShintos living with Confucians = No ProblemConfusians living with Baha'is = No ProblemBaha'is living with Jews = No ProblemJews living with Atheists = No ProblemAtheists living with Buddhists = No ProblemBuddhists living with Sikhs = No ProblemSikhs living with Hindus = No ProblemHindus living with Baha'is = No ProblemBaha'is living with Christians = No ProblemChristians living with Jews = No ProblemJews living with Buddhists = No ProblemBuddhists living with Shintos = No ProblemShintos living with Atheists = No ProblemAtheists living with Confucians = No ProblemConfusians living with Hindus = No ProblemMuslims living with Hindus = ProblemMuslims living with Buddhists = ProblemMuslims living with Christians = ProblemMuslims living with Jews = ProblemMuslims living with Sikhs = ProblemMuslims living with Baha'is = ProblemMuslims living with Shintos = ProblemMuslims living with Atheists = ProblemMUSLIMS LIVING WITH MUSLIMS = BIG PROBLEM**********SO THIS LEAD TO *****************They’re not happy in GazaThey're not happy in EgyptThey're not happy in LibyaThey're not happy in MoroccoThey're not happy in IranThey're not happy in IraqThey're not happy in YemenThey're not happy in AfghanistanThey're not happy in PakistanThey're not happy in SyriaThey're not happy in LebanonThey're not happy in NigeriaThey're not happy in KenyaThey're not happy in Sudan******** So, where are they happy? **********They're happy in AustraliaThey're happy in EnglandThey're happy in BelgiumThey're happy in FranceThey're happy in ItalyThey're happy in GermanyThey're happy in SwedenThey're happy in the USA & CanadaThey're happy in Norway & IndiaThey're happy in almost every country that is not Islamic! And who do they blame? Not Islam... Not their leadership... Not themselves... THEY BLAME THE COUNTRIES THEY ARE HAPPY IN!! And they want to change the countries they're happy in, to be like the countries they came from where they were unhappy!!!Islamic Jihad: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONISIS: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAl-Qaeda: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONTaliban: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONHamas: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONHezbollah: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONBoko Haram: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAl-Nusra: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAbu Sayyaf: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAl-Badr: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONMuslim Brotherhood: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONLashkar-e-Taiba: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONPalestine Liberation Front: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAnsaru: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONJemaah Islamiyah: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAbdullah Azzam Brigades: AN ISLAMIC TERROR ORGANIZATIONAND A LOT MORE!!!!!!!Muslims follow the Koran, the Koran teaches...1] Kill any one who insults Islam or Moham-mad. (Koran.33;57-61).2) Kill all Muslims who leave Islam. (Koran.2;217/4;89/Bukhari.9;84-57).3) Koran can not be doubted. (Koran.2;1).4) Islam is the only acceptable religion. (Koran.3;85).5) Muslims must fight (jihad) to non-Muslims, even if they don't want to. (Koran.2;216).6) We the non-Muslims are pigs and apes. (Koran. 2;62-65/Koran.5;59-60/Koran.7;166).7) We the non-Muslims cannot be friends with Muslims. (Koran.5;51).8/ We the non-Muslims sworn enemies of Muslims and Islam. (Koran.4;101).9) We the non-Muslims can be raped as sex slave. (Koran.4;3 & 24/5;89/23;5/33;50/58;3/70;30).10) We the non-Muslims the vilest of creatures deserving no mercy. (Koran.98;6).11) Muslim must terrorized us (non-Muslims). (Koran.8;12 &59-60/ Bukhari.4;52;220).12) Muslims must strike terror into non-Muslims hearts. (Koran.8;60).13) Muslims must lie to us (non-Muslims) to strengthen and spread Islam. (Koran.3;28?16;106).14) Muslims are allowed to behead us (non_Muslims) (Koran.47;4).15) Muslims are guaranteed to go to heaven if they kill us (non-Muslims). (Koran.9;111).16) Marrying and divorcing pre-pubescent children is OK. (Koran.65;4).17) Wife beating is OK. (Koran.4;34).18) Raping wives is OK. (Koran.2;223).19) Proving rape requires 4 (four) male Muslim witnesses. (Koran.24;13).20) Muslims are allowed to crucify and amputate us (non-Muslims). Koran.8;12/47;4)</comment>

<comment>Every time you see a muslim writing here or talking to you he/she will say only a small majority of muslims are violent. ISIS, Taliban, Al Queda dont represent them. Azam Khan and Owaisi are not their voices. Really? Here you go with proof that Islam is a religion of terrorism and majority of muslims are fundamentalist.Violent Muslims — Just A Few Bad Apples? By Conor LynchEvery once in a while we experience a brutal attack in the Western world by Islamic extremists, like last week’s assault on Charlie Hebdo for publishing provocative cartoons of Muhammad. Islamic terrorist attacks are rare in the West, especially compared to Muslim countries in the Middle East and Southeast Asia, but they always provoke a debate over whether the religion of Islam, itself, bears some responsibility for the attackers’ actions.Many people immediately defend the religion of Islam and say that violent extremists are a very small minority of the 1.6 billion Muslims around the world and that Islam is a religion of peace. “We cannot generalize and blame all Muslims or the religion itself,” they say, and, “the great majority of Muslims condemn terrorism.”  While it would be wrongheaded to regard the Islamic world at large as inherently violent, it would be simply wrong to regard it as all peaceful, too.According to a 2013 poll by the Pew Research Center, in certain countries, disturbingly healthy minorities believe suicide bombing is often/sometimes justified. For example, 39% in Afghanistan, 26% percent in Bangladesh, 29% in Egypt, 40% in Palestinian territory, 18% in Malaysia, and 13% in Pakistan feel that suicide bombings are justifiable.To be sure, suicide attacks are somewhat peculiar to Islamic fundamentalism. Islamic terror organizations have been responsible for more than 85% percent of suicide bombings since the 1980s.Politics and Islam go hand in hand in some parts of the Muslim world. In much of the Middle East, North Africa, South Asia, and Southeast Asia a majority of people, according to a 2013 poll by the Pew Research Center, favor making Sharia (Islamic law) the official law in their country. 99% in Afghanistan, 91% in Iraq, 89% in Palestinian territories, 84% in Pakistan, and 82% percent in Bangladesh, etc. In many Muslim regions where the majorities believe in Sharia (Middle East, North Africa, South Asia), majorities also believe in severe corporal punishments.For other draconian punishments it once again depends greatly on region. For example, 86% who believe in Sharia in Egypt favor the death penalty for converts (Khafirs).So, a startlingly high percentage of people in some parts of the Muslim world hold many aspects of their religious texts literal and believe society should be governed by these doctrines.Both Christianity and Islam have the potential to produce disgusting and violent acts through extremism. The problem is that the Islamic world seems to have more of these “extremist” type views. Some may not consider killing apostates or stoning adulterers to death “extremist,” but they should. These may not be terrorist acts, but they are barbaric and uncivilized, and many in the Muslim world believe in them. Extremists who take Islamic doctrines literally believe they are following the example of the prophet Muhammad, who waged violent wars to spread Islam.The Charlie Hebdo massacre is only the latest example of how extremists have tried to use violence to silence or punish artists and journalists for drawings or books or films. Salman Rushdie, whose book, “The Satanic Verses,” earned him death threats and a death fatwa from the Iranian clergy for years, said: “Religion, a medieval form of unreason, when combined with modern weaponry becomes a real threat to our freedoms. … This religious totalitarianism has caused a deadly mutation in the heart of Islam and we see the tragic consequences in Paris today.”True liberals should not avoid criticizing Muslim voices that promote modern barbarity. If we choose to sit back and say that Islam only has a problem with a small minority, the real reformers in these societies who risk their lives for liberty will no doubt fail. We must support liberty, even if it offends ones sacred beliefs in Islam.</comment>

<comment>TO ALL HINDU, BUDDHIST, CHRISTIAN, SIKH, ATHEIST AND OTHERS, PLEASE DON'T DATE OR GO OUT WITH MUSLIM BOYS OR GIRLS ELSE YOU WILL SEE WHAT HAPPENED TO SO MANY POOR SOULS WHO ARE SUFFERING. PARTICULARLY WHEN YOU MARRY A MUSLIM BOY HE WILL MAKE YOU HIS 4TH WIFE OR HAVE HIS MULLAH MARRY YOU. HERE IS THE STORY OF ONE SUCH GIRL.“I had no Idea how bad Islam was until I dated a Muslim…” By PAMELA GELLER on May 7, 2014I receive a lot of mail. The most heartbreaking letters, of course, are from Muslims in Muslim countries who have left Islam or question Islam, and their intellectual freedom is met with violence from family members and friends. They write to cry for help. I get a few of those emails a week, and I help each one to the best I can. Notice how they aren’t writing CAIR for help.This email is of a different nature. The journey of this young woman, whose name I have changed  for obvious reasons, is all too common, but little told. It is difficult to break free from the institutionalized thinking, reinforced in every corner of the our culture, concerning Islam. Those who challenge the propagandist narrative are smeared and libeled. Few take the risk.I salute this “escapee from islam.” Her note to me is a declaration of freedom and an invitation to others to question their premise and not be afraid to think.-----Hello Pamela Geller,When I hear you speak about the dangers of Islam, I sometimes fear for your life because I know how aggressive Muslims can be. I dated one for 3 years. I have learned a lot more about Islam by watching your videos and reading Ali Sina’s blog (within 2 months) than my 3 years relationship with my ex Muslim boyfriend. I was taught never to judge others’ religion and culture. I took Cultural Anthropology, World Religion, Philosophy, Social Environment classes and I have the Quran at home. In school, professors makes Islam and all other religions seem very peaceful and I guess it has a lot to do with freedom of religion and ethics. During those 3 years I use to believe that Islam was indeed peaceful, my Ex convinced me that it was very peaceful… but I never believed it was perfect. No religion is perfect in my mind.I am a Psychology major, while taking psychology courses I realized that Islam created people who are ignorant, dependent and selfish. I started to slowly realize that I was dating a massive manipulator. His logic made no sense to me. I couldn’t question Muhammad or Allah, and when I did, he would go ballistic.At times he was very sweet and kind but I felt like Islam limited his mind. He was afraid to make his own choices. Everything was a sin. I use to believe women who covered themselves were very committed and loving to their religion and happy. Many of the things you have said really has helped me move on. You have convinced me to the point in which I truly believe Islam IS a cult. I use to be naive and defend Islam because of all the “Stereotype”.I was a willing victim to my ex boyfriend and to Islam. I was willing to move with him to Saudi Arabia, Thanks god I didn’t. The amount of prejudice and racism in that culture is incredible. I know for a fact that my ex hates Jews with passion and had no idea what the holocaust was. Even after showing him pictures of dead Jews and dead children during the holocaust, he would twist the topic and talk about the Palestinians who were suffering due to the Jews.Islam brainwashes people. Everything in Islam goes against Psychology. It is highly impossible to have a stable mindset while raised in that culture. You don’t have a voice in that culture and religion. It took me a long time to start healing because I had a very strong love for my ex, even now after a year, I sometimes cry at night.I see you as a mother and a hero. Your bravery is astonishing because I know you must get millions of death threats and criticism. I honestly don’t know how you handle it but it takes a strong person to do what you do.Hearing you speak and fight against Islam is very important, not only for me, but to the world. I had no Idea how bad Islam was until I dated a Muslim man. My ex had some good qualities and it made me damn sad that he had such strong hold on Islam. I hate Islam because there are potential good people in Islam but the more they are controlled by their faith, the more inhuman they become. It is an honor to write to such a strong woman such as yourself. I wish I could help fight against Islam. The stories I hear from Muslim women breaks my heart and it angers me that it is the norm in the middle east. I wish I would live long enough to see the day Islam is banned from the globe. It might be wishful thinking but Islam is too dangerous. These stories I have read and watched on you tube about women being murdered due to Islam makes me appreciate my life even more. I was stupidly willing to give up my freedom to move to Saudi Arabia. So many women over there would wish to take my place, I took my freedom for granted.God Bless you  :)XXXXXXXXX</comment>

<comment>How are "Sunni" terrorist groups different from "Shia" extremists?Thamir AlHejailan .All shiite terrorist groups I can think of at least in the past 35 years have  pledged allegiance to Khomeini. They have one central authority they are ALL loyal to. Secondly, there is NO international Shiite terrorist group. All Shiite terrorist groups have regional ambitions that don't go beyond the theater of battle they are fighting in. Thirdly, all Shiite terrorist groups don't try to provoke problems with their Sunni neighbours for obvious pragmatic reasons (only 10% of Muslims are Twelver Shiites) despite secretly despising them and subversively working to convert Sunnis to Shiism.Sunni groups have no central authority they all report to. Even bin laden at his height had multiple partners who were killed (like Abdullah Azzam) or sidelined (Zawahiri). Not to mention multiple branches of Al-Qaeda refused his direct orders like Zarqawi in Iraq(which later  became ISIS). Their success frankly comes from their superior financing skills largely through extortion and the heroin trade (also an unknown amount from wealthy donors in the gulf)</comment>

<comment>Muslims on this board are trying to divide Hindus by saying this Brahmin or that low caste or this South India versus North India and so on. The real culprit of all of this are Sunni muslims who are violent and follows the Wahhabi sect where the only message from Allah is to kill Khafirs.-------Sunni-Shiite Conflict Spikes as al-Qaeda Massacres 60 Shiites By Juan Cole | Jun. 13, 2013 |A massacre of Shiite militiamen and other villagers by al-Qaeda in Hatla, Deir al-Zor, Syria, is sending shock waves through the Middle East, which has already witnessed a sharpening of conflict between Sunni Muslims and their Shiite neighbors in recent years.This video of the al-Qaeda types exulting over the cadavers of the dead Shiites [later reports made clear this was a Twelver village] and calling them pigs and dogs is sufficiently graphic and disturbing that I’m just linking to it for the strong of stomach, not embedding it here. In Arabic, the overwrought al-Qaeda fighter admonishes the Kuwaiti Sunnis to polish off their own Shiites (Shiites are 15-30% of the Kuwaiti population). He seems to imply that the Alawite rulers of Syria are getting support from Kuwaiti Shiites, which doesn’t strike me as very likely. That they are sending aid to Hizbullah would make more sense. The Nusayris or Alawis are folk Shiites who are not viewed as Shiites or even Muslims by many of the Twelver Shiites of Lebanon, Iraq and Iran. Hizbullah is not supporting Alawites because it thinks they are Shiites! It thinks Syria is useful the way it is, to Hizbullah.The Syrian conflict is not about religion, even a little bit. Nor is the divide in Islam between Sunnis and Shiites always a salient determinant of politics or social action. But it is true that most Alawites, Christians, Druze and other small minorities either support the secular Baath government of Bashar al-Assad or at least are afraid of elements of the opposition. But so too do substantial numbers of Sunni Syrians support the government or decline to come out against it. The rebels are largely Sunni, but some of them are relatively secular-minded, or are Sufi mystics. A small number are radicals who have declared an affiliation with al-Qaeda, but this group has been disproportionately successful on the battlefield, in part because it receives money and weapons from private Gulf millionaires and billionaires who lean toward the hard line Salafi school.The intervention of the Shiite militia, Hizbullah, in the recent battle for al-Qusayr, in which the rebels were defeated and expelled, inflamed Sunni-Shiite tensions. But note that Hizbullah is not fighting for Shiites and most of its members probably don’t consider the folk religion of the Nusayris (popularly called Alawites) to be true Islam. They are fighting to shore up al-Assad because he offers them Syria as a land bridge over which Iranian arms can flow. Without the Syrian land bridge, Hizbullah would be cut off and could easily fall to an Israeli invasion.Still, politics are being reworked along sectarian lines. The Sunni-ruled Gulf Cooperation Council is imposing sanctions on Hizbullah and its followers in the Gulf.And there has been fighting between Alawites and Sunnis in the northern Lebanese port of Tripoli. Radical Sunni Salafis have gone off from Sidon in Lebanon to fight in Syria on the rebel side, and therefore against Hizbullah. Lebanese are fighting Lebanese in Syria, on a small scale.Let’s hope it doesn’t turn large scale.</comment>

<comment>What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>Violent verses from Koran that preaches terror.The Quran:Quran (2:191-193) – “And slay them wherever ye find them, and drive them out of the places whence they drove you out, for persecution [of Muslims] is worse than slaughter [of non-believers]… but if desist, then lo! Allah is forgiving and merciful. And fight them until persecution is no more, and religion is for Allah.”There is a good case to be made that the textual context of this particular passage is defensive war, even if the historical context was not. However, there are also two worrisome pieces to this verse. The first is that the killing of others is authorized in the event of “persecution” (a qualification that is ambiguous at best). The second is that fighting may persist until “religion is for Allah.” The example set by Muhammad is not reassuring.Quran (2:244) – “Then fight in the cause of Allah, and know that Allah Heareth and knoweth all things.”Quran (2:216) – “Fighting is prescribed for you, and ye dislike it. But it is possible that ye dislike a thing which is good for you, and that ye love a thing which is bad for you. But Allah knoweth, and ye know not.” Not only does this verse establish that violence can be virtuous, but it also contradicts the myth that fighting is intended only in self-defense, since the audience was obviously not under attack at the time. From the Hadith, we know that Muhammad was actually trying to motivate his people into raiding caravans with this verse.Quran (3:56) – “As to those who reject faith, I will punish them with terrible agony in this world and in the Hereafter, nor will they have anyone to help.”Quran (3:151) – “Soon shall We cast terror into the hearts of the Unbelievers, for that they joined companions with Allah, for which He had sent no authority”. This speaks directly of polytheists, yet it also includes Christians, since they believe in the Trinity (ie. what Muhammad incorrectly believed to be ‘joining companions to Allah’).Quran (4:74) – “Let those fight in the way of Allah who sell the life of this world for the other. Whoso fighteth in the way of Allah, be he slain or be he victorious, on him We shall bestow a vast reward.” The martyrs of Islam are unlike the early Christians, led meekly to the slaughter. These Muslims are killed in battle, as they attempt to inflict death and destruction for the cause of Allah. Here is the theological basis for today’s suicide bombers.Quran (4:76) – “Those who believe fight in the cause of Allah…”Quran (4:89) – “They but wish that ye should reject Faith, as they do, and thus be on the same footing (as they): But take not friends from their ranks until they flee in the way of Allah (From what is forbidden). But if they turn renegades, seize them and slay them wherever ye find them; and (in any case) take no friends or helpers from their ranks.”Quran (4:95) – “Not equal are those believers who sit (at home) and receive no hurt, and those who strive and fight in the cause of Allah with their goods and their persons. Allah hath granted a grade higher to those who strive and fight with their goods and persons than to those who sit (at home). Unto all (in Faith) Hath Allah promised good: But those who strive and fight Hath He distinguished above those who sit (at home) by a special reward,-” This passage criticizes “peaceful” Muslims who do not join in the violence, letting them know that they are less worthy in Allah’s eyes. It also demolishes the modern myth that “Jihad” doesn’t mean holy war in the Quran, but rather a spiritual struggle. Not only is the Arabic word used in this passage, but it is clearly not referring to anything spiritual, since the physically disabled are given exemption. (The Hadith reveals the context of the passage to be in response to a blind man’s protest that he is unable to engage in Jihad and this is reflected in other translations of the verse).Quran (4:104) – “And be not weak hearted in pursuit of the enemy; if you suffer pain, then surely they (too) suffer pain as you suffer pain…” Is pursuing an injured and retreating enemy really an act of self-defense?Quran (5:33) – “The punishment of those who wage war against Allah and His messenger and strive to make mischief in the land is only this, that they should be murdered or crucified or their hands and their feet should be cut off on opposite sides or they should be imprisoned; this shall be as a disgrace for them in this world, and in the hereafter they shall have a grievous chastisement”Quran (8:12) – “I will cast terror into the hearts of those who disbelieve. Therefore strike off their heads and strike off every fingertip of them” No reasonable person would interpret this to mean a spiritual struggle.Quran (8:15) – “O ye who believe! When ye meet those who disbelieve in battle, turn not your backs to them. (16)Whoso on that day turneth his back to them, unless maneuvering for battle or intent to join a company, he truly hath incurred wrath from Allah, and his habitation will be hell, a hapless journey’s end.”Quran (8:39) – “And fight with them until there is no more persecution and religion should be only for Allah” From the historical context we know that the “persecution” spoken of here was simply the refusal by the Meccans to allow Muhammad to enter their city and perform the Haj. Other Muslims were able to travel there, just not as an armed group, since Muhammad declared war on Mecca prior to his eviction. The Meccans were also acting in defense of their religion, since it was Muhammad’s intention to destroy their idols and establish Islam by force (which he later did). Hence the critical part of this verse is to fight until “religion is only for Allah.” According to Ibn Ishaq (324), Muhammad justified the violence further by explaining that “Allah must have no rivals.”Quran (8:57) – “If thou comest on them in the war, deal with them so as to strike fear in those who are behind them, that haply they may remember.”Quran (8:59-60) – “And let not those who disbelieve suppose that they can outstrip (Allah’s Purpose). Lo! they cannot escape. Make ready for them all thou canst of (armed) force and of horses tethered, that thereby ye may dismay the enemy of Allah and your enemy.”Quran (8:65) – “O Prophet, exhort the believers to fight…”Quran (9:5) – “So when the sacred months have passed away, then slay the idolaters wherever you find them, and take them captives and besiege them and lie in wait for them in every ambush, then if they repent and keep up prayer and pay the poor-rate, leave their way free to them.” According to this verse, the best way of staying safe from Muslim violence is to convert to Islam. Prayer (salat) and the poor tax (zakat) are among the religions Five Pillars.Quran (9:14) – “Fight them, Allah will punish them by your hands and bring them to disgrace…”Quran (9:20) – “Those who believe, and have left their homes and striven with their wealth and their lives in Allah’s way are of much greater worth in Allah’s sight. These are they who are triumphant.” The “striving” spoken of here is Jihad.Quran (9:29) – “Fight those who believe not in Allah nor the Last Day, nor hold that forbidden which hath been forbidden by Allah and His Messenger, nor acknowledge the religion of Truth, (even if they are) of the People of the Book, until they pay the Jizya with willing submission, and feel themselves subdued.” “People of the Book” refers to Christians and Jews. This was one of the final “revelations” from Allah and it set in motion the tenacious military expansion, in which Muhammad’s companions managed to conquer two-thirds of the Christian world in just the next 100 years. Islam is intended to dominate all other people and faiths.Quran (9:30) – “And the Jews say: Ezra is the son of Allah; and the Christians say: The Messiah is the son of Allah; these are the words of their mouths; they imitate the saying of those who disbelieved before; may Allah destroy them; how they are turned away!”Quran (9:38-39) – “O ye who believe! what is the matter with you, that, when ye are asked to go forth in the cause of Allah, ye cling heavily to the earth? Do ye prefer the life of this world to the Hereafter? But little is the comfort of this life, as compared with the Hereafter. Unless ye go forth, He will punish you with a grievous penalty, and put others in your place.” This is a warning to those who refuse to fight, that they will be punished with Hell.Quran (9:41) – “Go forth, light-armed and heavy-armed, and strive with your wealth and your lives in the way of Allah! That is best for you if ye but knew.” See also the verse that follows (9:42) – “If there had been immediate gain (in sight), and the journey easy, they would (all) without doubt have followed thee, but the distance was long, (and weighed) on them” This contradicts the myth that Muslims are to fight only in self-defense, since the wording implies that battle will be waged a long distance from home (in another country and on Christian soil, in this case, according to the historians).Quran (9:73) – “O Prophet! strive hard against the unbelievers and the hypocrites and be unyielding to them; and their abode is hell, and evil is the destination.” Dehumanizing those who reject Islam, by reminding Muslims that they are merely firewood for Hell, makes it easier to justify slaughter. It also explains why today’s devout Muslims have little regard for those outside the faith.Quran (9:88) – “But the Messenger, and those who believe with him, strive and fight with their wealth and their persons: for them are (all) good things: and it is they who will prosper.”Quran (9:111) – “Allah hath purchased of the believers their persons and their goods; for theirs (in return) is the garden (of Paradise): they fight in His cause, and slay and are slain: a promise binding on Him in truth, through the Law, the Gospel, and the Quran: and who is more faithful to his covenant than Allah? then rejoice in the bargain which ye have concluded: that is the achievement supreme.”Quran (9:123) – “O you who believe! fight those of the unbelievers who are near to you and let them find in you hardness.”Quran (18:65-81) – This parable lays the theological groundwork for honor killings, in which a family member is murdered because they brought shame to the family, either through apostasy or perceived moral indiscretion. The story, which is not found in any Jewish or Christian source, tells of Moses encountering a man with “special knowledge” who does things which don’t seem to make sense on the surface, but are then justified according to later explanation. One such action is to murder a youth for no apparent reason (74). However, the wise man later explains that it was feared that the boy would “grieve” his parents by “disobedience and ingratitude.” He was killed so that Allah could provide them a ‘better’ son.Quran (21:44) – “We gave the good things of this life to these men and their fathers until the period grew long for them; See they not that We gradually reduce the land (in their control) from its outlying borders? Is it then they who will win?”Quran (25:52) – “Therefore listen not to the Unbelievers, but strive against them with the utmost strenuousness…” “Strive against” is Jihad – obviously not in the personal context. It’s also significant to point out that this is a Meccan verse.Quran (33:60-62) – “If the hypocrites, and those in whose hearts is a disease, and the alarmists in the city do not cease, We verily shall urge thee on against them, then they will be your neighbors in it but a little while. Accursed, they will be seized wherever found and slain with a (fierce) slaughter.” This passage sanctions the slaughter (rendered “merciless” and “horrible murder” in other translations) against three groups: Hypocrites (Muslims who refuse to “fight in the way of Allah” (3:167) and hence don’t act as Muslims should), those with “diseased hearts” (which include Jews and Christians 5:51-52), and “alarmists” or “agitators who include those who merely speak out against Islam, according to Muhammad’s biographers. It is worth noting that the victims are to be sought out by Muslims, which is what today’s terrorists do. If this passage is meant merely to apply to the city of Medina, then it is unclear why it is included in Allah’s eternal word to Muslim generations.Quran (47:3-4) – “Those who reject Allah follow vanities, while those who believe follow the truth from their lord. Thus does Allah set forth form men their lessons by similtudes. Therefore when you meet in battle those who disbelieve, then smite the necks until when you have overcome them, then make (them) prisoners,” Those who reject Allah are to be subdued in battle. The verse goes on to say the only reason Allah doesn’t do the dirty work himself is in order to to test the faithfulness of Muslims. Those who kill pass the test. “But if it had been Allah’s Will, He could certainly have exacted retribution from them (Himself); but (He lets you fight) in order to test you, some with others. But those who are slain in the Way of Allah,- He will never let their deeds be lost.”Quran (47:35) – “Be not weary and faint-hearted, crying for peace, when ye should be uppermost (Shakir: “have the upper hand”) for Allah is with you,” This very important verse asserts that the Religion of Peace is not to grant peace to the broader society until Islamic rule has been established.Quran (48:17) – “There is no blame for the blind, nor is there blame for the lame, nor is there blame for the sick (that they go not forth to war). And whoso obeyeth Allah and His messenger, He will make him enter Gardens underneath which rivers flow; and whoso turneth back, him will He punish with a painful doom.” Contemporary apologists sometimes claim that Jihad means ‘spiritual struggle.’ Is so, then why are the blind, lame and sick exempted?Quran (48:29) – “Muhammad is the messenger of Allah. And those with him are hard (ruthless) against the disbelievers and merciful among themselves” Islam is not about treating everyone equally. There are two very distinct standards that are applied based on religious status.Quran (61:4) – “Surely Allah loves those who fight in His way” Religion of Peace, indeed! This is followed by (61:9): “He it is who has sent His Messenger (Mohammed) with guidance and the religion of truth (Islam) to make it victorious over all religions even though the infidels may resist.”Quran (61:10-12) – “O ye who believe! Shall I lead you to a bargain that will save you from a grievous Penalty?- That ye believe in Allah and His Messenger, and that ye strive (your utmost) in the Cause of Allah, with your property and your persons: That will be best for you, if ye but knew! He will forgive you your sins, and admit you to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow, and to beautiful mansions in Gardens of Eternity.” This verse was given in battle. It uses the Arabic word, Jihad.Quran (66:9) – “O Prophet! Strive against the disbelievers and the hypocrites, and be stern with them. Hell will be their home, a hapless journey’s end.” The root word of “Jihad” is used again here. The context is clearly holy war, and the scope of violence is broadened to include “hypocrites” – those who call themselves Muslims but do not act as such.From the Hadith:Bukhari (52:177) – Allah’s Apostle said, “The Hour will not be established until you fight with the Jews, and the stone behind which a Jew will be hiding will say. “O Muslim! There is a Jew hiding behind me, so kill him.”Bukhari (52:256) – The Prophet… was asked whether it was permissible to attack the pagan warriors at night with the probability of exposing their women and children to danger. The Prophet replied, “They (i.e. women and children) are from them (i.e. pagans).” In this command, Muhammad establishes that it is permissible to kill non-combatants in the process of killing a perceived enemy. This provides justification for the many Islamic terror bombings.Bukhari (52:220) – Allah’s Apostle said… ‘I have been made victorious with terror’Abu Dawud (14:2526) – The Prophet (peace_be_upon_him) said: Three things are the roots of faith: to refrain from (killing) a person who utters, “There is no god but Allah” and not to declare him unbeliever whatever sin he commits, and not to excommunicate him from Islam for his any action; and jihad will be performed continuously since the day Allah sent me as a prophet until the day the last member of my community will fight with the Dajjal (Antichrist)Abu Dawud (14:2527) – The Prophet said: Striving in the path of Allah (jihad) is incumbent on you along with every ruler, whether he is pious or impiousMuslim (1:33) – the Messenger of Allah said: I have been commanded to fight against people till they testify that there is no god but Allah, that Muhammad is the messenger of AllahBukhari (8:387) – Allah’s Apostle said, “I have been ordered to fight the people till they say: ‘None has the right to be worshipped but AllahMuslim (1:149) – “Abu Dharr reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, which of the deeds is the best? He (the Holy Prophet) replied: Belief in Allah and Jihad in His cause…”</comment>

<comment>politics with religion to win election n business with religion to become rich = Anti india</comment>

<comment>politics with religion (Islam) to divide India and then mix terror with religion (Islam) to divide India again = anti india.</comment>

<comment>For long Brahminical forces used these anti-democratic, anti-modern, primitive texts to oppress the great majority of Indian people. Now they are using these texts to justify the horrific killing. The saddest part of this story is that a large number of SC/ST/OBCs who were the victims of these so-called sacred texts are now siding with this barbaric gang to oppress non-Hindus.</comment>

<comment>Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>This is bullshit I know my vedas pretty thoroughly and there is no verse in Veda which talks about punishment on killing a cow. Vedas don't deal with crime and punishment, it has nothing to do with that. I wonder if the author could cite the verses that talk about this.</comment>

<comment>Look at this Mohan a && hole. Its time he retires and sits at home. With one leg in the grave he wants to stop Beef. hahaha. Ask him to come down south and we will make his grave here.</comment>

<comment>abe katwe kisko bol raha hai..shukra mana ki abhi tak bacha hua hai..hindus are in majority in this nation..we rule here....if you and your brothers dont like it ..leave.....</comment>

<comment>I want you guys to come to middle east and I will feed you pork and then once you are caught eating pork I want to see what happens? Oh well you are stoned on this friday so called Brave Indian but in reality jihadi muslim.</comment>

<comment>Mr. Modi be in India for sometime. You look to be a visiting professor in India. You cannot tell us what to eat and what not to eat. Instead of all these beef fiasco you should look at the millions who cannot even have one meal a day. Are you ignoring that fact and siding with these RSS Mohan Bhagwat who looks like an old cow, which should be sent to graze in a field. Amit Shah this is going to be the death knell of BJP. No you wont get the next 5 years for sure if you go on like this. Maharashtra especially Mumbai, and the BJP has a knack of creating unwanted problems for minorities and when something happens in Mumbai, all those Bollywood nincompoops come out in support. Bollywood has stopped eating Beef?  No we wont let you Modi to control us. Instead we will vote you out very soon if you go like this.</comment>

<comment>Please dont make personal attacks just because your Koran tells you to do so. We all know how violent you and your religion is so lets not stoop to the level of a muslim who will read Koran, then divide India, tells everyone that they cannot live with hindu majority and then once they get their own land, their mullah tells them to multiply like pigs. You got  your own land na. Then what the fuq you doing here ...go to your Pakistan na. Let Hindus, Buddhists, Jains, Sikhs, Atheists, others worry about how to handle RSS or whatever...but you are illegal in India. How can you even live here...so dont give me that BS that you were born here. SO? If you are born in UAE or Saudi or Libya or Algeria or Kuwait or any of those muslim countries do you get citizenship there? NO. And if you are non-muslim forget it. So time for you to pack and leave and leave India for others to decide on how to handle or what to do.</comment>

<comment>"Please dont make personal attacks just because your Koran tells you to do so." ---- please do let us know where does the Quran tell us to make personal attacks on others."We all know how violent you and your religion is so lets not stoop to the level of a muslim who will read Koran, then divide India, tells everyone that they cannot live with hindu majority and then once they get their own land, their mullah tells them to multiply like pigs." --- this is so not a personal attack!!"You got your own land na. Then what the fuq you doing here ...go to your Pakistan na." --- India is not your baap ki jaagir na. This country belongs equally to all citizens."but you are illegal in India." --- hmm, blah blah blah."So time for you to pack and leave and leave India for others to decide on how to handle or what to do." --- keep on dreaming. not going to happen.</comment>

<comment>I have quoted so many times...Koranic Satanic verses and if you still want to live in your dreamland of mullah telling you that you will get gorgeous beautiful voluptuous whores in hell he quoting from Koran and you believing then go for it and blow yourself up.I agree India belongs equally to all citizens but that was pre-1947. Once you muslim majority wanted your own land, you claimed you cannot live with other citizens like Hindu, Buddhist, Christians, Sikhs, and you divided India and named it PUREland Pakistan. We lost 1/3rd land to 1/10th muslim brothers who were equal citizens but got more land. Once you got what you want, India does not belong to you just like Pakistan does not belong to me. Can I today go to Pakistan and say this land belongs to me too? No it does not. Once you want and you got what you want you have to follow what you said...emigrate to Pakistan as per Jinnah.I know I am dreaming that you will leave India and honor your pact with other citizens Hindus, Christians, Buddhists, Sikhs where you said you want your own land and you will move and you didnt. Now, you are openly saying you cheated all other citizens then that's not new. We all know muslims cheat, spread terror and hatred. So you continue to prove it. Jai Hind.</comment>

<comment>But one country from Mr Modi needs to learn is Israel</comment>

<comment>In 5 years all the jehadis will either be kicked out from this country or will be sent in the company of 72 v!rg!ns. @meen</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>But better than traitors and better than those who kills others on the name of jeh@d</comment>

<comment>Sick. Try your beef trick down south. We will burn you</comment>

<comment>like rishis burned cows in yagya</comment>

<comment>I am so scared</comment>

<comment>Tera naam bhi amit hai. Tu kya amit shah ka goti hai kya? abhe k u tte, t eri maa kya cow hai?</comment>

<comment>It's very strange that people who kill others cowardly calls themselves BRAVE. How foolishly they follow what their mull@hs and m@darassas say. insh@ll@h m@sh@llh</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>the author lies. buffalo meet exports is not same as beef.</comment>

<comment>Man killed on October 1. Bakhts: SECULAR BASTTD**! WHAT HAPPENED IN 1984!!!Man killed on October 3. Bakhts: SECULAR BASTTD**! WHAT HAPPENED IN 1947!!!Man killed on October 5. Bakhts: SECULAR BASTTD**! WHAT HAPPENED IN 1605!!!</comment>

<comment>RSS magazine Panchjanya: Dadri beef lynching is justified because Vedas say one who kills a cow should be killed. RSS: We disown the article in Panchjanya Now idiots please tell us - are you against the Vedas or against your own magazine?</comment>

<comment>We are against muslims. WHY? Here you go.What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>Only muzzie fellas has the right 2 lynch hindus according to manmohan</comment>

<comment>I agree.Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>RSS dont have the balls to stop Beef exports...they know it is owned by mostly Hindus and the Income is shared for RSS/BJP welfare...world is witnessing a Wonder in India all RSS bosses are speak with their mouth and Man holes</comment>

<comment>Did muslims have equal rights in an undivided India? YES. But once the majority muslims wanted their own land and divided India they lost that right. Still Hindus allowed them to prosper, get the best jobs, be the richest man, be President, VP, CBI Chiief, even Army Chief, Police Chief ...as muslims, let them grew from 4% in 1947 to 20% today, gave them laws like multiple wives for each man that are based on Sharia even though others Hindu SIkh Buddhist others followed the Uniform law of one wife for one man and still muslims are doing exactly what they did in 1947. Spread hatred and divide India again. Look at J&K. Only state with muslim majority and they want to divide India as well as spread terrorism. It is built in Koran to spread terrorism.Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>I am BJP supporter and I fully agree there is double standard and I also think this is RSS ploy to weaken modi, not just beef thing but also RSS remark on reservations shud end or relook in during highly caste sensitive bihar election has more or less ensured BJP will loose bihar badly and that will be a full stop to any reforms in nation</comment>

<comment>Stop your bull ..we all know who  you are.</comment>

<comment>First  these sanghi chaddis should stop wearing cow hide belts on their half pants...  Their supreme is wearing a cow hide belt and they go about being hurt with cow slaughter...  LAMAO</comment>

<comment>I was thinking on the same lines for Talibani who are muslims that since they are cut lund they need to prove and have 4 wives but why not cut their entire lund.</comment>

<comment>No wonder his name is tu fail😝</comment>

<comment>Oh god,  these views appear to be more dangerous than many anti semitic views of late shri Adolf Hitler Maharaj!his political progeny seem to have gone berserk with views that appear to be lunatic,  but are not such. They seem to be hydra headed neo Indian fascism seeking to provoke terrorism among the so far peaceful,  basically law abiding Muslims living in harmony with us Hindu breathren! Call a dog mad, and kill it were the earlier tactics. Now call Anyone you do not like as having slaughtereda cow and slaughter him or them. There is no way the rural population is going to be able to keep all the cows alive feeding them. And cows are not allowed to be abandoned to roam free and destroy crops under law. So fascists are going to kill their political opponents even among Hindus selectively,  as cows will be put to death due to economic reasons by even fascists! But they will sieze political opponents and kill them. We will see it soon! Hey Ram! Hey Ram! What gandhi said, dying! </comment>

<comment>I wish his views are as bad as what Koran says or muslim's views are.What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>RSS is trying to malign and destabllilise Modiji's development agenda. </comment>

<comment>yeah right,. This is like saying Sunni muslims are trying to malign and destabilize India in the name of Islam.</comment>

<comment>Ban RSS and arrest all extremists of RSS</comment>

<comment>We have better things to do before that. We need to either get back the land we gave to Pakistan or move all the muslims back to Pakistan as per Jinnah's wish.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>What do you want to replace than</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people. Here you go...the most violent so called Islam cult is violent.Proof that Islam is Evil, Violent, and Intolerant- Straight From the Koran BY JAN MORGAN / ON MAY 13, 2014 AT 12:41 PMIslam..VERSES FROM THE QURAN.. EVIDENCE THAT ISLAM IS Clearly and Concisely Evil, Violent, and IntolerantEvery time I write and article that sheds Islam in a negative light, my life gets threatened by muslims, I get hate messages from liberals, and I’m labeled a ‘racist’ by idiots who do not realize that Islam is not a race.If Muslims are so proud of their quran, why would they threaten my life for simply sharing verses straight from their “holy book”?Islam is also not a religion, It is a theocracy and terrorist cult that hides behind the mask of religion in order to acheive its mission of world domination.Furthermore, people, including news anchors who call islaic terrorists “extremists and radicals”, are wrong… They are DEVOUT muslims simply following the dictates of their koran.I have read the koran and studied it thoroughly. I have read the muslim brotherhood’s documented plan for the destruction of America from within.I will not submit or convert and I will not allow the death threats, the name calling, and the pack threat mentality stop me from telling the truth about Islam.Here it is folks… straight from their own Quran.. You read the verses below and you decide..Peaceful religion…??? NO WAY…Fact: in the 1400 year history of islam, muslims have murdered over 270 million people.Fact: Since 911, muslims have committed over 23 thousand deadly terror attacks around the world.Fact: Islam can not and will not peacefully co exist with any other religion on earth. Never.Fact: Where are all those so called “peaceful” muslims when the terror attacks occur? Why do they not stand publicly against the attacks as a religious group? The reason….. is in the verses below… It goes against their koran.Muslim (20:4645) – “…He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa’id) said: What is that act? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah! Jihad in the way of Allah!”Muslim (20:4696) – “the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: ‘One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.'”Muslim (19:4321-4323) – Three separate hadith in which Muhammad shrugs over the news that innocent children were killed in a raid by his men against unbelievers. His response: “They are of them (meaning the enemy).”Tabari 7:97 The morning after the murder of Ashraf, the Prophet declared, “Kill any Jew who falls under your power.” Ashraf was a poet, killed by Muhammad’s men because he insulted Islam. Here, Muhammad widens the scope of his orders to kill. An innocent Jewish businessman was then slain by his Muslim partner, merely for being non-Muslim.Tabari 9:69 “Killing Unbelievers is a small matter to us” The words of Muhammad, prophet of Islam.Ibn Ishaq: 327 – “Allah said, ‘A prophet must slaughter before collecting captives. A slaughtered enemy is driven from the land. Muhammad, you craved the desires of this world, its goods and the ransom captives would bring. But Allah desires killing them to manifest the religion.’”Ibn Ishaq: 990 – Lest anyone think that cutting off someone’s head while screaming ‘Allah Akbar!’ is a modern custom, here is an account of that very practice under Muhammad, who seems to approve.Ibn Ishaq: 992 – “Fight everyone in the way of Allah and kill those who disbelieve in Allah.” Muhammad’s instructions to his men prior to a military raid.</comment>

<comment>this is what haters wanted... as they have uprooted the italian khangress...</comment>

<comment>They are not distributing roses and iam not hating them for that</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>source ?? aNY IDEA why mahatma gandhi used to endorse RSS...</comment>

<comment>RSS terrorists doing what they do best, directing hate who is surprised here?</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Amen to that.</comment>

<comment>sadly I cannot defend this lunatic who wrote this. :(</comment>

<comment>Dal prices have increased by 350% from May 2014 to October 2015. Modi is extremely upset, say sources.</comment>

<comment>this was done to ensure bjp looses in bihar and i think its RSS work</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>350%</comment>

<comment>Cool, he can be 'extremely upset' till November 5, then back to the normal state.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>And what about those peope who post comments with fake name. May be they also should be ashamed</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I cannot even say Chi Chi Shame on muslims since they will pretend to be my brothers till they are in minority. Once in majority they will divide and spread terror.</comment>

<comment>The most talkative prime minister in India's history expresses 'extreme' displeasure through anonymous sources. LOL!</comment>

<comment> Indian Secularism is Colour Blind  ~~~  Tufail Ahmad @tufailelif  http://indiafacts.co.in/indian-secularism-is-colour-blind-2/ </comment>

<comment>Indian Secularism is color Green the color of terrorist Muslims.Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>Use your own brains, instead of sending links. Do you even know what the RSS mouthpiece has said? Do you realize its implications? What exactly are you trying to defend?</comment>

<comment>Precisely, use your own brain & understand what is going on right now. You should be the last person to tell me what I am to defend or not. You keep defending what you have to. Stop assuming things about me. You know nothing. People like you are the walking zombies on this earth.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>The RSS says people who kill cows should be killed. That is what is going on. What is your story?</comment>

<comment>While RSS only talks and barks we muslims are really killing people. You Hindus are cowards. You cannot even kill one person and even if you kill one person the media which is controlled by muslims will shout and make it as if this is the fault of RSS and BJP and PM and all Hindus. While you Hindus fight we continue to blow up ourselves to get 72 whores in hell and we are spreading terror as if there is no to'row. Here is the proof.4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM EST – The number of people killed by terrorists worldwide in 2013 rose by 60 percent compared to the previous year – from 11,133 to 17,958 – with four Sunni Muslim extremist groups responsible for two-thirds of all fatalities, according to a comprehensive annual study.Eighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.The report also found that Islam as a “religion” as a driving ideology for terrorism has jumped significantly in the last five years, and accounts for most of the terror activity in the Middle East and North Africa, South Asia and Sub-Saharan Africa.As a driver for terrorist groups, muslim religion far outstrips “politics,” In 2013, 60 percent of all attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013.“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>There are many things said by many SECULARS. Our former PM manmohan singh once said that only muslims have first claim on the National resources. One person asked to remove police for fifteen minutes so that 18 crore people could teach lesson to eight crore. So don't bother so much about who say what</comment>

<comment>Yes, I condemn the 15-minute statement, and most 'seculars' condemned it too when it was made. Now people in the government are supporting communal incidents. Why can't you understand this? Not rocket science</comment>

<comment>And how many writers returned their awards as a mark of protest.  Nobody...Why you people have the problem criticism. Was killing safdar hashmi not a communal incidentWas forcing M F hussain to leave the country not a communal incident.Was abusing Tasleema Nasreen not a communal incidentWere forcing 4 lac kashmiri Pandits to leave their homes not a communal incidentWere killing of innocents in Hashimpura not a communal incidentWas killing of Narendra Dabholkar not a communal incidentWas banning Satanic verses not a communal incident.Was banning the movie Vishwaroopam movie not an act of communal incidentDid the SECULARS raise their voice in the same tone the way they  they are raising now.If a person calls for the rights of Hindus people call them an agent of RSS, but if someone continuous follow the appeasement policy of minorities then what should they be called.. member of congress, cpi, jdu, sp??.This is also not a rocket science dear</comment>

<comment>The appeasement is a figment of your imagination. Muslims are economically the most backward segments of society. I don't want to repeat myself, but the point is today's climate of intolerance is being sponsored and created either by the government of forces close to it.</comment>

<comment>There you go. Again using your mosque grown mullah analysis. Bo-Red if muslims are economically backward arent you to be blamed for it? First of all you fought the war of independence with all of us but then you muslim majority wanted to divide India. Jinnah specifically said muslims cannot stay with Hindu majority. We lost 1/3rd land to 1/10th muslim population. Jinnah said every muslim will emigrate to Pakistan. But, you stayed here and you were 4%. Now, if you are going to have 4 wives and 12 children from each of them so that today you are 20% from 4% of the population how are you going to feed all? Then you claim you are economically backward. Yes, if I have 4 wives and 12 children from each I will also be poor and not able to feed all those mouths. Why do we have a law in India if we are secular that allows muslims like you to have multiple wives? If your religion is of equality to man and woman then why not allow your mom to have multiple lovers and husbands. Today's climate if intolerance is propagated by you. What happened when you were kicking out Hindus from the only muslim majority state of J&K. Was that not the time of intolerance? Is it because the only intolerance happens when muslims are treated at par with Hindus Sikhs Buddhists? So you justify Owaisi brothers who are spreading hatred and violence. Tell me something. What intolerance was there pre-1947 that made you divide India? What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Sikhs in 1947 but Hindus cannot even pay back to you since Gandhiji went on Ansan. Tell me something. What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Bangladeshi Shia in 1971? Tell me something.....how can India be secular and still intolerant if you are allowed to blast your noise pollution of Azaan 5 times a day in a foreign language Arabic even if sick people are there next door in hospitals and children are in Schools next door ...who is intolerant here?</comment>

<comment>Ohhhh  what a finding.  You people are being appeased by so called SECULAR parties like congress, sp, jdu, rjd... Second if any people or community produce endless children then that person or that particular community can never grow and it applies on every person and community irrespective of religion.Lastly how you have come to the conclusion that climate of intolerance is being sponsored.</comment>

<comment>Amit why are you logically arguing with this idiot. He wants to have 4 wives, 12 kids from each, he wants to grow from 4% in 1947 to 20% today and yet he wants to feed all of them and divide India again and yet he dont want you to question it.if muslims are economically backward arent you muslims to be blamed for it? First of all you fought the war of independence with all of us but then you muslim majority wanted to divide India. Jinnah specifically said muslims cannot stay with Hindu majority. We lost 1/3rd land to 1/10th muslim population. Jinnah said every muslim will emigrate to Pakistan. But, you stayed here and you were 4%. Now, if you are going to have 4 wives and 12 children from each of them so that today you are 20% from 4% of the population how are you going to feed all? Then you claim you are economically backward. Yes, if I have 4 wives and 12 children from each I will also be poor and not able to feed all those mouths. Why do we have a law in India if we are secular that allows muslims like you to have multiple wives? If your religion is of equality to man and woman then why not allow your mom to have multiple lovers and husbands. Today's climate if intolerance is propagated by you. What happened when you were kicking out Hindus from the only muslim majority state of J&K. Was that not the time of intolerance? Is it because the only intolerance happens when muslims are treated at par with Hindus Sikhs Buddhists? So you justify Owaisi brothers who are spreading hatred and violence. Tell me something. What intolerance was there pre-1947 that made you divide India? What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Sikhs in 1947 but Hindus cannot even pay back to you since Gandhiji went on Ansan. Tell me something. What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Bangladeshi Shia in 1971? Tell me something.....how can India be secular and still intolerant if you are allowed to blast your noise pollution of Azaan 5 times a day in a foreign language Arabic even if sick people are there next door in hospitals and children are in Schools next door ...who is intolerant here?</comment>

<comment>My story is to present the  TRUTH & FACTS ,unlike yours!</comment>

<comment>Intimidation and violence towards minorities is being celebrated under the present regime. This is happening because people like you cheer them on.</comment>

<comment>if muslims are economically backward arent you muslims to be blamed for it? First of all you fought the war of independence with all of us but then you muslim majority wanted to divide India. Jinnah specifically said muslims cannot stay with Hindu majority. We lost 1/3rd land to 1/10th muslim population. Jinnah said every muslim will emigrate to Pakistan. But, you stayed here and you were 4%. Now, if you are going to have 4 wives and 12 children from each of them so that today you are 20% from 4% of the population how are you going to feed all? Then you claim you are economically backward. Yes, if I have 4 wives and 12 children from each I will also be poor and not able to feed all those mouths. Why do we have a law in India if we are secular that allows muslims like you to have multiple wives? If your religion is of equality to man and woman then why not allow your mom to have multiple lovers and husbands. Today's climate if intolerance is propagated by you. What happened when you were kicking out Hindus from the only muslim majority state of J&K. Was that not the time of intolerance? Is it because the only intolerance happens when muslims are treated at par with Hindus Sikhs Buddhists? So you justify Owaisi brothers who are spreading hatred and violence. Tell me something. What intolerance was there pre-1947 that made you divide India? What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Sikhs in 1947 but Hindus cannot even pay back to you since Gandhiji went on Ansan. Tell me something. What intolerance was there that you butchered millions of Hindus and Bangladeshi Shia in 1971? Tell me something.....how can India be secular and still intolerant if you are allowed to blast your noise pollution of Azaan 5 times a day in a foreign language Arabic even if sick people are there next door in hospitals and children are in Schools next door ...who is intolerant here?</comment>

<comment>LOL....Yet the scale of Intimidation & violence towards minorities is so large that there is some ethnic cleansing going on right now in India. Small incidents have been magnified & you want to gleefully play along. When a Hindu gets Killed, it doesn't matter.If you had used your brains, you would have noticed in the links I have shared, who is intimidating whom. But perhaps you have chosen to see only one side of the truth. Stop this pretense Bo-red friend & look at the reality. They are playing clever games & you are falling for them. Use your brain Indeed,but perhaps that is not one of your good habits I see.</comment>

<comment>The state is creating a climate of intimidation and suppression that has no precedence in Indian history. That is the reality. I hope you get the difference between the state and non-state actors. But I doubt it.</comment>

<comment>Was Jinnah a state or non-state actor? Was massacre of Hindus and Sikhs in 1947 a state sponsored or non-state sponsored action. Was the massacre of Hindus and Shia Bangladeshi in 1971 a state or non-state action? Was kicking and massacre of Hindus in a secular Hindu majority country in the muslim majority state of J&K a state or non-state action? Why is that when you are in majority, you divide, you terrorize, you massacre, you butcher you are silent. But, when the chicken comes home to roost you complain.</comment>

<comment>LOL...Check this out;siege men·tal·i·tya defensive or paranoid attitude based on the belief that others are hostile toward one.Be Jumpy always. Keep it up!</comment>

<comment>I will</comment>

<comment>it a fake story.. again msm misquoting .. u should read the original article..</comment>

<comment>superb article..</comment>

<comment>LOL...a Sanskrit movie is banned, coz "deities" are shown? WTF? Is this the Secularism of India?</comment>

<comment>which movie?</comment>

<comment>What is wrong in what RSS said. These things are actually written in Vedas. Hinduism has always been tolerant.</comment>

<comment>But from when did the words of some religious books become more important than law of the land</comment>

<comment>Since RSS came to power.</comment>

<comment>So you are telling me that allowing muslims to have multiple wives even though the constitution treats man and woman equal and all others can only have one wife is tolerance. You are telling me that kicking and massacring pundits out of J&K by muslims is tolerance? You are telling me that Owaisi spitting venom is tolerance? You are telling me that pampering of muslims is tolerance but when they are treated at par with all others then it is intolerance. You are telling me that paying for their Hajj trips from 1947 by flying them on Saudia to their holyland Mecca while no other no Hindu no Buddhist no Christian no Sikh no one gets subsidy from government which we all tax payers pay for these muslims is tolerance and the moment we question it we are intolerant. Then you know what. I would rather be intolerant and treat all Indians equal then to be tolerant and treat muslims better than other or different than all others. Vande Mataram.</comment>

<comment>Yeah right....</comment>

<comment>if these asshats of Nagpur would just leave Modi to function in peace and run the country. if there arent enough enemies outside we need these buggers to derail everything</comment>

<comment>You mean to say these asshats Sunni who should leave all others whether Shia or Ahmediya or Bohri or Aga Khani or Hindus or Sikhs or Christians to live and let live?</comment>

<comment>Shame that  #HindusAreHumansToo  is trending right now..;-)//..LOL</comment>

<comment>So Hindu's are reaffirming their humanity on twitter and we are all supposed to feel better about ourselves and chest thump?</comment>

<comment>It is called the irony of the situation, when the only majority has to affirm its existence, when all the hoopla is about the "minorities" being in trouble. Isn't that an amazing paradox. When did I ask you to do any of that  chest thumping or whatever monkey business, I am just asking you do an objective assessment of the situation.</comment>

<comment>I did assess the situation objectively and whats mind bogglingly baffling is 'what kind of complex do we have that despite being a majority of 80% we still feel stifled and persecuted?' It has been debated whether there is a lack of compassion in hinduism because of a deviation between dharma and karuna and its reinterpretation as religion and foolishness. A penchant to follow swamis rather than scholars of religion and some kind of indoctrinated imaginary persecution that that makes one think why should I be the only one doing it or showing compassion etc..and thus erecting walls of prejudice and bigotry. I suggest you examine these feelings of persecution in details and you might be quite surprised what you find. In any case it appears that in our believe that an inward eye leads to a mastering of oneself but perhaps this inward eye has become too closed to understand the cause effect of our actions in the outward world</comment>

<comment>At the outset, I am not writing from the standpoint of what you posit,i.e,"  'what kind of complex do we have that despite being a majority of 80% we still feel stifled and persecuted?'. I am only trying to highlight the glaring inconsistencies & various other contradictions prevalent in the current public discourse.If you have done an objective analysis, how could it miss your assessment, that things are mightily skewed in India, as far as,defining the theme of the "minority treatment" is concerned". Recent efforts by the media, to constantly bombard Indian audiences describing this,"skewed phenomenon" is rather foolish.The current media has unnecessarily  distorted  the reality to further the agendas of some political parties.Since the Independence of our Nation,didn't we acknowledge the presence of these Minority groups & allowed them to live with us as equals? Not only that,we, were magnanimous enough, to not to impose ourselves or our will on them or wantonly suppress them to the point of massive exploitation.They were always treated as equals.They have had access to the same opportunities as Majority would have. They have flourished & have grown in their own fashion or capacities.We allowed them to profess their own faith, allowing them to build their own places of worship across India. We allowed them to practice their own,"Personal Laws". We allowed them to develop their own educational institutions. There was never a moment for them to feel suffocated or constrained in anyway, whatsoever being a "minority".It is another matter, that, this minority group was exploited by the Political Establishments,for several years, for their own selfish benefits. They have been used as vote-banks .Somewhere along the line, these minority groups, became complacent. They thought that as long as their caretakers ( Political Parties ) were there, there was nothing to worry about. They were made to believe that they were being,"taken care" in exchange for their support( read VOTES ! ).With this assurance they went about their business. However,the key point to be noted is that,what benefits accrued in return for their pledge of support? Did it improve the quality of their lives? Did it ensure that they grew as well as their "Majority" counterpart? What happened to their development or progress in their community? Why,a Saachar Committe was necessitated  58 Years post Independence to review their standing in the society?What happened to the patronage, that they received from their caretakers since so many years?Why did the Saachaar Committee conclude the following? The status of Indian Muslims are below the conditions of Scheduled Castes and Scheduled Tribes.The overall percentage of Muslims in bureaucracy in India is just 2.5% whereas Muslims constitute above 14% of the population of India. - WikiIndia has 79% of Hindus as per the latest Census report.You ask why ,"there is a lack of compassion in Hinduism because of a deviation between dharma and karuna"? There is not deviation as such. 79% percent of Hindus do not subscribe to the violence or bigotry being practiced by few individuals.They are such a minority,they don't even fit in the statistical models or references.It is not about following some, "penchant to follow swamis", it is about countering the "distorted reality" that is being projected by the so called do-gooders or the self-appointed of guardians of society to protect "Secularism" ( Various Political forces opposed to the Right Wing & their stooges in Writers, Media Personnel ).If few "fringe elements" react, you want to paint the entire 79% Hindu community as sinners?All that we ask is to evaluate the situation objectively & give a neutral verdict!Is the ask,too demanding?</comment>

<comment>Nice analysis.</comment>

<comment>"The current media has unnecessarily distorted the reality to further the agendas of some political parties."- the media panders to the ruling parties or panders to the opposition and you have media that supports or opposes ideologies. Firstpost is a prime example of such media- you will have opinions that support and oppose events accordingly"Minority groups & allowed them to live with us as equals, we allowed them to profess their own faith..and so on and so forth about allowing people"-  My question being, are benevolent Hindus feeling that this benevolence is being mistaken for weakness? What acts of minorities are making kinder or saner Hindus feel this way? It might please you to know that people are surprisingly the same, they have the same problems with corruption in their parts of the country, the same problems with law and order, access to clean, unpolluted air, water and food. Is it this lack of resources, this population explosion driving people to fight for existence? The earth will soon be populated by 10 times more than the amount of human beings that it can support (not even mentioning the havoc caused to plant and animal life), are these episodes a fight for resources? more basic than religious? hey there are many questions that need to be answeredIt is interesting you mentioned how people are being used as vote banks, and I completely agree with you- why aren't you protesting for transparency to stop this usage of people for votes?The fringe is now the center- the MLA,s MPs and Swami's in positions of influence are stoking this polarity, and making no effort to hide their personal ideology under tameez and peace. Economists all over the world study and recognize that development is a virtue of human resource development and not at the cost of. Why are the current leaders unaware of it?You should be celebrating Hinduism and its plurality,  Lord Shiva will be dancing his dance soon</comment>

<comment>Now C5M Vampire Ghose will come out and say hindus may or maynot be human nut internet hindus are not human at all</comment>

<comment>Sometimes I think that sickulars are a much bigger problem for India than muslim fanatics</comment>

<comment>You forgot yourself and other RSS terrorist supporters...</comment>

<comment>So you are telling me that allowing muslims to have multiple wives even though the constitution treats man and woman equal and all others can only have one wife is tolerance. You are telling me that kicking and massacring pundits out of J&K by muslims is tolerance? You are telling me that Owaisi spitting venom is tolerance? You are telling me that pampering of muslims is tolerance but when they are treated at par with all others then it is intolerance. You are telling me that paying for their Hajj trips from 1947 by flying them on Saudia to their holyland Mecca while no other no Hindu no Buddhist no Christian no Sikh no one gets subsidy from government which we all tax payers pay for these muslims is tolerance and the moment we question it we are intolerant. Then you know what. I would rather be intolerant and treat all Indians equal then to be tolerant and treat muslims better than other or different than all others. Vande Mataram.</comment>

<comment>Both of them are far lesser a problem than Hindu fanatics</comment>

<comment>yesterday Taslima nasreen said that all seculars in india are anti hindu... thats why the creeps keep asking ban for her books :)</comment>

<comment>Just the perfect material for all the Adarsh Liberals, Traitors, Treacherous Community who are hell bent on destroying this Great Nation. Enjoy! New twist in Karnataka Bajrang Dal activist’s murder: BJP MP says witnesses getting threat calls from Pakistan numbers  http://www.dailymail.co.uk/indiahome/indianews/article-3277356/New-twist-Karnataka-Bajrang-Dal-activist-s-murder-BJP-MP-says-witnesses-getting-threat-calls-Pak-numbers.html </comment>

<comment> UP to give Akhlaq’s family four flats in Noida  http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/lucknow/UP-to-give-Akhlaqs-family-four-flats-in-Noida/articleshow/49435244.cms </comment>

<comment>Height of appeasement</comment>

<comment>Sambhaji Rao, muslims will only complain till they are in majority. Then they will divide India.Allowing muslims to have multiple wives even though the constitution treats man and woman equal and all others can only have one wife is tolerance. You are telling me that kicking and massacring pundits out of J&K by muslims is tolerance? You are telling me that Owaisi spitting venom is tolerance? You are telling me that pampering of muslims is tolerance but when they are treated at par with all others then it is intolerance. You are telling me that paying for their Hajj trips from 1947 by flying them on Saudia to their holyland Mecca while no other no Hindu no Buddhist no Christian no Sikh no one gets subsidy from government which we all tax payers pay for these muslims is tolerance and the moment we question it we are intolerant. Then you know what. I would rather be intolerant and treat all Indians equal then to be tolerant and treat muslims better than other or different than all others. Vande Mataram.</comment>

<comment> 11-Year-old Girl Punished in School for Wearing 'Tilak' on Her Birthday  http://www.ndtv.com/telangana-news/11-year-old-girl-punished-in-school-for-wearing-tilak-on-her-birthday-743069  Rs 500 Fine For Faded Mehendi? That's What A Chennai School Demanded From A Class II Kid http://www.indiatimes.com/news/india/rs-500-fine-for-faded-mehendi-that-s-what-a-chennai-school-demanded-from-a-class-ii-kid-246162.html The Biggest one of 'em; Prashant Poojari killed for opposing Cow Slaughter & being a member of Bajrang Dal  http://www.chakranews.com/an-open-letter-to-karnataka-cm-siddaramaiah-prashant-poojarys-death-matters/5128 No outrage, not a sound...by MSM..No immersion of Durga Idols in Kolkata on 23-24 Oct, as it is clashing with Muharram..No sound by the media...And they are questioning whom?....LOL!</comment>

<comment>Its not even in the news, such is the plight of hindus in this country, keep spreading the truth!</comment>

<comment>FP is a very biased publication like all sickulars</comment>

<comment>RSS is the villian for BJP and India. If RSS and Mohan Bhagvath  keep quiet or somebody more powerful than them impose a Ban on their speech for another 3-4 years, chances are  that Modi rules for another 10 years which is good for India. Otherwise it  is  evident that RSS is working against Modi only. It is better BJP delinks itself from RSS for their own survival.  Let RSS understand that it Modi who matters more for India than RSS.</comment>

<comment>So you are telling me that allowing muslims to have multiple wives even though the constitution treats man and woman equal and all others can only have one wife is tolerance. You are telling me that kicking and massacring pundits out of J&K by muslims is tolerance? You are telling me that Owaisi spitting venom is tolerance? You are telling me that pampering of muslims is tolerance but when they are treated at par with all others then it is intolerance. You are telling me that paying for their Hajj trips from 1947 by flying them on Saudia to their holyland Mecca while no other no Hindu no Buddhist no Christian no Sikh no one gets subsidy from government which we all tax payers pay for these muslims is tolerance and the moment we question it we are intolerant. Then you know what. I would rather be intolerant and treat all Indians equal then to be tolerant and treat muslims better than other or different than all others. Vande Mataram.</comment>

<comment>One Common thing between the bashers of Islam and Terrorist is "They both accept that Islam supports terrorism and methods to inflict damage to innocents.When you want to know the views or to get cured of an ailment or disease you go to a Certified Doctor but not a person who is college dropout.Osama bin Laden, Ayman Al zawahari, Leader of Al shabaab Ahmed Abdi Godane and many many more leaders of all these terrorist organisations and terrorist in individual capacity who cherry pick verses and quote are not SCHOLARS of Islam. But media and Islam Bashers take their views regarding Islam but not from Scholars of Islam who have issued Fatwa condemning it but no one highlights that.Infact if you analyise the views of terrorist and these Islam Bashers they both think in the same way, they both accept that Islam means Terror, which is not.</comment>

<comment>Well done RSS. Proud to be a Hindu.</comment>

<comment>creep</comment>

<comment>Upadhay ji. Kyaa ho gaya? Khaini khaae kya?</comment>

<comment>he is a creep who keeps writing sarcastic nonsense to make hindus look unreasonable and fanatic..</comment>

<comment>Lendu </comment>

<comment>are u ? whats that?</comment>

<comment>Leave him, he is a pussy...doesn't stand a chance in the outside world....all he can manage to do like his other coward scums.. is to sit on FP &  spew copious amounts of venom, blatant lies, slander...these low life scums will be crushed by their own vile acts...</comment>

<comment>Haha outside world...says an anonymous troll. Dont rant your own personal issues and complexes here.</comment>

<comment>I cannot beat bhakts in making Hindus look unreasonable and fanatic.</comment>

<comment>So you are telling me that allowing muslims to have multiple wives even though the constitution treats man and woman equal and all others can only have one wife is tolerance and reasonable and non-fanatic. You are telling me that kicking and massacring pundits out of J&K by muslims is tolerance? You are telling me that Owaisi spitting venom is tolerance? You are telling me that pampering of muslims is tolerance but when they are treated at par with all others then it is intolerance. You are telling me that paying for their Hajj trips from 1947 by flying them on Saudia to their holyland Mecca while no other no Hindu no Buddhist no Christian no Sikh no one gets subsidy from government which we all tax payers pay for these muslims is tolerance and the moment we question it we are intolerant. Then you know what. I would rather be intolerant and treat all Indians equal then to be tolerant and treat muslims better than other or different than all others. Vande Mataram.</comment>

<comment>creep</comment>

<comment>Just because some mouthpiece says something...guys dont hyperventilate. This Indian Express and others from Media have sold their soul to satan. 64% of Koran says it is ok to terrorize and kill. Does it means all muslims are bad? In Bible it is open that they preach beating of women. Does it mean Christianity is bad?</comment>

<comment>I hope you are only pretending to be an idiot. The RSS wants to implement what the vedas allegedly says, THAT is the problem</comment>

<comment>Whatever man....you are trying to over play RSS and underplay the terrorist muslims. No one is idiot these days. Enough of this moronic stuff you posting. Do you even know Vedas? Do you even know what RSS wants to implement. Instead why not go with facts. 99.9999% of the terrorists are muslims. YES OR NO? 95% of the suicide bombers are muslims. YES OR NO? 64% of Koran talks about killing and terrorism. YES OR NO. In last 5 years or even 10 years or even 15 years 99.999% of terrorist attacks have happened due to muslims. You continue to deny them and then talk about this mumbo jumbo RSS or whatever. This is like saying the Vatican wants to implement strict code of conduct from 100 AD. No one believes you. But, then the problem is that you want to close your eyes for real terrorism and want to bring up some organization which no one knows or cares. Kudos for working in gloves with the talibani terrorists. They spread terrrorism using guns and you spread terrorism using your pen.</comment>

<comment>When there is an issue of Islamic terrorism, we can speak about it. In India at the moment the raging issue is of Hindu extremism. Since both of us are living in India (I presume), that should be of greater concern.</comment>

<comment>How can it be Hindu extremism? India is a democratic country and there is going to be some law and order problems in 120 crore population. Every murder if you are going to give a color of Hindu versus Muslim then lets do it. Lets go around and see how many murders happens on a daily basis in India, how many were murdered by muslims, how many by Hindu and so on. Just because your mullah tells you that there is HIndu extremism or you read in media it has to be backed by data. Do you know 10,000 riots happened after 1947. Do you know most of the riots happens in muslim majority areas and in most cases by muslim mullah giving a call for riots after Friday sermon. However, the media only talked about one riot for many years. How is that possible. Another fact is that if Hindus are extremist then how come Hindus are being reduced and muslims grew 500% from 4% in 1947 to 20% today. India's biggest concern today is terrorism by muslims and you conveniently forgot that and talk about Hindu extremism. Some idiot Hindu makes a statement after the fact and you blame it on every Hindu including the BJP party and PM himself. On the other hand when every terrorist act in India has happened by muslims you conveniently blame it on militants who has no religion. Really? If you are not going to look at the facts and just keep talking in vaccuum then oh well...Do you want me to put some of the things Owaisi has said here? Will that make you concerned about muslim extremism?</comment>

<comment>Many more Muslims have died in riots than Hindus. Please check your data. I agree that terrorism is a major problem. But I don't understand how speaking out against lynching of an innocent man (now three men, including Jammu and HP) is bad thing. What is your stand on the lynchings?</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>You are facts are wrong and you are Lying, distorting the Holy book Quran.You say 64% of Quran say ok to terrorize and kill can you prove it. Dont just write without knowing anything.There are 6236 verses in Quran by your logic 64% meains 3991 verses says it is ok to terroize and kill prove your point and show these verses.Else don't just say stupid things in public forum and try to do your home work and learn before saying anything stupid.</comment>

<comment>You are right...I am sorry it is not 64% but 61% of Koran talks ill and violence so my fault and 71% of Sira (your Muhammad's biography) consists of Jihad. But, now that I am able to prove that 61% of Koran only talks about ill and violence are you ready to stop violence or dump your religion?What does the Koran say about nonbelievers? September 6, 2013“About sixty-one percent of the contents of the Koran are found to speak ill of the unbelievers or call for their violent conquest; at best only 2.6 percent of the verses of the Koran are noted to show goodwill toward humanity. About seventy-five percent of Muhammad’s biography (Sira) consists of jihad waged on unbelievers.”Quotes from the Quran/Koran“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the same whether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a seal upon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishment awaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is that for which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation, grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among His servants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominious punishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90“Lord…Give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 2:286“Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran 3:147“I shall cast terror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off the very tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12“Let not the unbelievers think they will ever get away. They have not the power so to do. Muster against them all the men and cavalry at your command, so that you may strike terror into the enemy of Allah and your enemy…” Quran 8:59-60“When the sacred months are over slay the idolaters wherever you find them. Arrest them, besiege them, and lie in ambush everywhere for them.” Quran 9:5“Prophet, make war on the unbelievers and the hypocrites and deal rigorously with them. Hell shall be their home: an evil fate.” Quran 9:73“Believers, make war on the infidels who dwell around you. Deal firmly with them. Know that God is with the righteous.” Quran 9:123“Believers, take neither the Jews nor the Christians for your friends. They are friends with one another…” Quran 5:51“He that chooses a religion over Islam, it will not be accepted from him and in the world to come he will be one of the lost.” Quran 3:85“Let not believers make friends with infidels in preference to the faithful – he that does this has nothing to hope for from Good – except in self-defense. God admonishes you to fear Him: for to God shall all return.” Quran 3:28“Garments of fire have been prepared for the unbelievers. Scalding water shall be poured upon their heads, melting their skins and that which is in their bellies. They shall be lashed with rods of iron.“Whenever, in their anguish, they try to escape from Hell, back they shall be dragged, and will be told: ‘Taste the torment of the Conflagration!'” Quran 22:19-20“Muhammad is God’s apostle. Those who follow him are ruthless to the unbelievers but merciful to one another.” Quran 48:29“Those that deny Our revelations We will burn in fire. No sooner will their skins be consumed than We shall give them other skins, so that they may truly taste the scourge. God is mighty and wise.” Quran 4:56“Believers, know that the idolaters [non-Muslims] are unclean. Let them not approach the Sacred Mosque after this year is ended.” Quran 9:28“The unbelievers among the People of the Book [Bible] and the pagans shall burn for ever in the fire of Hell. They are the vilest of all creatures.” Quran 98:6Quotes from the Koran/QuranWhat is a ‘kaffir?’Kaffir is an Arabic term for a nonbeliever or “infidel.” Kuffar is the plural, “infidels”:Also spelled ‘kafir’ or ‘kaffir’, Kuffar is a highly derogatory Arabic term used to refer to non-Muslims, though it is usually directed less against “People of the Book” (Christians and Jews) and more against others (Hindus, Buddhists, Shintoists, etc).Separate laws govern Muslims and kuffars in an Islamic state with kuffars being viciously suppressed.For example: the blood payment to the family of a murdered Muslim man in Saudi Arabia is 1,000,000 Riyals; the payment to the family of a murdered Hindu woman is 3,333 Riyals.“Against kuffars make ready your strength to the utmost of your power, including steeds of war to strike terror into the (hearts of) the Enemy of Allah and your enemy, and others beside, whom you may not know, but whom Allah does know. Whatever you shall spend in the Cause of Allah, shall be repaid to you, and you shall not be treated unjustly.” (Qur’an: 8:60)</comment>

<comment>Here's my answer to yourmisconceptions about islam by replying to what you quoted about Quran withChapter Number and AyatYou Quoted:“This Book is not to be doubted…. As for the unbelievers, it is the samewhether or not you forewarn them; they will not have faith. God has set a sealupon their hearts and ears; their sight is dimmed and grievous punishmentawaits them.” Quran 2:1/2:6-2:10Answer"- Where it is written here to Kill orJustifying killing. Here it is talking about life after Death.2.) You Quoted wrongly like before and cherrypicking the verses but still“God’s curse be upon the infidels! Evil is thatfor which they have bartered away their souls. To deny God’s own revelation,grudging that He should reveal His bounty to whom He chooses from among Hisservants! They have incurred God’s most inexorable wrath. An ignominiouspunishment awaits the unbelievers.” Quran 2:89-2:90Answer 2.89",And when there came to them a Book from Allahconfirming that which was with them - although before they used to pray forvictory against those who disbelieved - but [then] when there came to them thatwhich they recognized, they disbelieved in it; so the curse of Allah will beupon the disbelievers.Answer 2.89",How wretched is that for which they soldthemselves - that they would disbelieve in what Allah has revealed through[their] outrage that Allah would send down His favor upon whom He wills fromamong His servants. So they returned having [earned] wrath upon wrath. And forthe disbelievers is a humiliating punishment.But still where it says to kill, it is sayingabout life after death....3) You Quoted              “Lord…Give us victory overthe unbelievers.” Quran 2:286While the complete Verse is,“Allah does not charge asoul except [with that within] its capacity. It will have [the consequence of]what [good] it has gained, and it will bear [the consequence of] what [evil] ithas earned. "Our Lord, do not impose blame upon us if we have forgotten orerred. Our Lord, and lay not upon us a burden like that which You laid uponthose before us. Our Lord, and burden us not with that which we have no abilityto bear. And pardon us; and forgive us; and have mercy upon us. You are ourprotector, so give us victory over the disbelieving people."But still where it says to kill, GIVE USVICTORY OVER DISBELIEVING PEOPLE means killing people how can you came to thatconclusion.You Quoted “Lord…give us victory over the unbelievers.” Quran3:1474)  Thecomplete Translation of what you quoted above  "Our Lord,forgive us our sins and the excess [committed] in our affairs and plant firmlyour feet and give us victory over the disbelieving people."Again GIVE US VICTORY OVER DISBELIEVING PEOPLEmeans killing people how come you came to that conclusion.5) You Quoted  “I shall castterror into the hearts of the infidels. Strike off their heads, strike off thevery tips of their fingers.” Quran 8:12Read the complete surah Allah was asked forHelp against those who were inflicting and killing innocents so Allah grantedthem help of the angels against the atrocities of the Non Believers of thattime. It was for those people who were being killed mercilessly how can youcompare two situations and say it applies everywhere, again you are doing whatother terrorist organizations are doing today.I can go on and onBrother, my Humble request to you is don’t spread misconceptions  and don’t listen to the versions of those whowant to gain power fame and money by using the Quran for their personal gain.RegardingSaudi Govt. I can’t comment on what is going on Saudi because I am not aware ofon what particular case you are quoting as far as I know there are problems in Saudidue to the non application of law to their citizens not only Hindus orChristians but also many many muslims face problems in that country.I humblerequest you to you again is actions of individuals or group of individuals doesn’tmake the entire race, religion, country  alsoguilty of the crime those people are making.Same like the actionsof right wing Hindu groups they say something about Hinduism which I don’tbelieve is true cause many friends of mine are Hindu and I can proudly say I neverencounter any problem with them in my 28 yrs of life.</comment>

<comment>My dear friend, please tell all this what you told me to your brothers in ISIS, Taliban, Al Quieda who are using these verses to wage a war on infidels including non-sunni. So I am not spreading anything here....it is them who are killing and butchering non-muslims. I can give you the number of terrorist deaths every year by these muslim terrorist. You can conveniently mix this with HIndu or Christian groups and play innocent but the reality is that when 99.9999% of the terrorists are muslims and 95% of the suicide bombers are muslims it is difficult to digest what you are saying that this is just a fluke. Sorry man ...not buying it.</comment>

<comment>Buddy, Don't tell me that ISIS,Taliban,Al qeida etc are my brother's they are not. It's very wrong, I Don't regard them as muslims and humans who are inflicting damage to innocents.But I hope I cleared the misconceptions created by mis interpretations of those people who are maliging Islam and spreading terror.Regarding your take on my reply it's upto you if want to stay with your assumptions and logic. Cant help.But we 99% of 1.6 Billion Muslims around the world reject the theory and representations of Islam by Iillinformed Less Educated about Islam Terrorist and Terrorist organisations.</comment>

<comment>My Dear friend, I am glad that you think ISIS, Taliban, etc are not your brothers. But, look from our perspective. 99.999% of terrorism worldwide is inflicted by muslims. I think you are trying hard to say that ISS, Taliban are maligning Islam but they are using the verses of Islam to justify their terror.Now, you are bold enough to say that 99% of 1.6 Billion muslims around the world reject the theory of ISIS and Taliban. But, your numbers dont speak with actions. If that is the case, then 1% of the muslims cannot spread terror like they are spreading. It is not humanly possible. For example, if only 1% of muslims wanted to divide India and 99% said we want to stay with our Hindu Buddhist Christian Sikh and other brothers and sisters with whom we fought against Britishers, you are telling me that Jinnah would have been able to separate with India and divide India? No way. Majority of muslims wanted to divide India. Now lets look at the only muslim majority state of India called Jammu & Kashmir. If majority muslims 99% said we don't want to spread terrorism, we want our Hindu brothers (pundits) to stay in J&K, we love India, we dont want to divide you think we will have so many problems like we see today. So your majority theory dont work my friend. I know you are trying but facts show that you are theory is wrong. In fact, I would say 90% of muslims believe in ISIS, Taliban, Al Quieda and so look around. Each muslim country is having a problem. Even after 1947 you muslims were only 4% and so you told Hindu Buddhist and others that you are like their brother but as soon as you are 20% today guess what is happening? Hatred spread against PM Modi. Hatred spread against RSS. All this while no muslim is standing up to Owaisi and Azam Khan and saying that Hindus have given you so much in India and you dont want to divided India so go to hell Owaisi. But, I dont see that.</comment>

<comment>Here you go. I will give you below the Koran and how majority of Koran talks about Kafir and killing them. Now, who is stupid. The mullahs are stupid who will tell you to blow yourself so that you can get 72 virgins in hell. Did you ever see a mullah blowing himsefl? No. While stupid kids like you are brain washed and blow themselves, the mullah is enjoying his life with his 4 wives. Do you know the status of Osama? He was having multiple wives in a haveli while guys like you killed themselves. Do you know the life of Dawood? While he is enjoying his life in this world stupid people like you are the reasons mullah's are getting away with terrorism. You will never agree as your mullah told so but learn to be logica and use your mind not your cut lund.Sharia Law for Non-Muslims Chapter 5-The Kafir Jul 17 2010 | by Bill WarnerWe now come to a new subject–the unbeliever or non-Muslim. The word “non-Muslim” is used in the translation of Sharia law, but the actual Arabic word used is “Kafir”. But the word Kafir means far more than non-Muslim. The original meaning of the word was “concealer”, one who conceals the truth of Islam.The Koran says that the Kafir may be deceived, plotted against, hated, enslaved, mocked, tortured and worse. The word is usually translated as “unbeliever” but this translation is wrong. The word “unbeliever” is logically and emotionally neutral, whereas, Kafir is the most abusive, prejudiced and hateful word in any language.There are many religious names for Kafirs: polytheists, idolaters, People of the Book (Christians and Jews), Buddhists, atheists, agnostics, and pagans. Kafir covers them all, because no matter what the religious name is, they can all be treated the same. What Mohammed said and did to polytheists can be done to any other category of Kafir.Islam devotes a great amount of energy to the Kafir. The majority (64%) of the Koran is devoted to the Kafir, and nearly all of the Sira (81%) deals with Mohammed’s struggle with them. The Hadith (Traditions) devotes 32% of the text to Kafirs1. Overall, the Trilogy devotes 60% of its content to the Kafir.Hadith37%Sira81%Koran64%Total60%Amount of Text Devoted to the KafirThe Sharia does not devote nearly that much to the Kafir since Sharia law is primarily for Muslims. Besides, the Kafir has few rights, so there is little to expound on.Religious Islam is what Muslims do to go to Paradise and avoid Hell. What Mohammed did to Kafirs was not religious, but political. Political Islam is what is of concern to Kafirs, not the religion. Who cares how a Muslim worships, but every one of us is concerned as to what they do to us and say about us. Political Islam should be of concern to every Kafir.Here are two Sharia references about Kafirs:w59.2 […] And this clariﬁes the Koranic verses and hadiths about hatred for the sake of Allah and love for the sake of Allah, Al Walaa wa al Baraa, being unyielding towards the Kafirs, hard against them, and detesting them, while accepting the destiny of Allah Most High insofar as it is the decree of Allah Mighty and Majestic.Hatred for the sake of Allah and love for the sake of Allah is called Al Walaa wa al Baraa, a fundamental principle of Islamic ethics and Sharia. A Muslim is to hate what Allah hates and love what Allah loves. Allah hates the Kafir, therefore, a Muslim is to act accordingly.40:35 They [Kafirs] who dispute the signs [Koran verses] of Allah without authority having reached them are greatly hated by Allah and the believers [Muslims]. So Allah seals up every arrogant, disdainful heart.h8.24 It is not permissible to give zakat [charity] to a Kafir, or to someone whom one is obliged to support such as a wife or family member.Here are a few of the Koran references: A Kafir can be mocked–83:34 On that day the faithful will mock the Kafirs, while they sit on bridal couches and watch them. Should not the Kafirs be paid back for what they did?A Kafir can be beheaded—47:4 When you encounter the Kafirs on the battleﬁeld, cut off their heads until you have thoroughly defeated them and then take the prisoners and tie them up firmly.A Kafir can be plotted against—86:15 They plot and scheme against you [Mohammed], and I plot and scheme against them. Therefore, deal calmly with the Kafirs and leave them alone for a while.A Kafir can be terrorized—8:12 Then your Lord spoke to His angels and said, “I will be with you. Give strength to the believers. I will send terror into the Kafirs’ hearts, cut off their heads and even the tips of their fingers!”A Muslim is not the friend of a Kafir—3:28 Believers should not take Kafirs as friends in preference to other believers. Those who do this will have none of Allah’s protection and will only have themselves as guards. Allah warns you to fear Him for all will return to Him.A Kafir is evil—23:97 And say: Oh my Lord! I seek refuge with You from the suggestions of the evil ones [Kafirs]. And I seek refuge with you, my Lord, from their presence.A Kafir is disgraced—37:18 Tell them, “Yes! And you [Kafirs] will be disgraced.”A Kafir is cursed—33:60 They [Kafirs] will be cursed, and wherever they are found, they will be seized and murdered. It was Allah’s same practice with those who came before them, and you will ﬁnd no change in Allah’s ways.KAFIRS AND THE PEOPLE OF THE BOOKMuslims tell Christians and Jews that they are special. They are “People of the Book” and are brothers in the Abrahamic faith. But in Islam you are a Christian, if and only if, you believe that Christ was a man who was a prophet of Allah; there is no Trinity; Jesus was not crucified nor resurrected and that He will return to establish Sharia law. To be a true Jew you must believe that Mohammed is the last in the line of Jewish prophets.This verse is positive:5:77 Say: Oh, People of the Book, do not step out of the bounds of truth in your religion, and do not follow the desires of those who have gone wrong and led many astray. They have themselves gone astray from the even way.Islamic doctrine is dualistic, so there is an opposite view as well. Here is the last verse written about the People of the Book (A later verse abrogates or nullifies an earlier verse.). This is the final word. It calls for Muslims to make war on the People of the Book who do not believe in the religion of truth, Islam.9:29 Make war on those who have received the Scriptures [Jews and Christians] but do not believe in Allah or in the Last Day. They do not forbid what Allah and His Messenger have forbidden. The Christians and Jews do not follow the religion of truth until they submit and pay the poll tax [jizya] and they are humiliated.The sentence “They do not forbid…” means that they do not accept Sharia law; “until they submit” means to submit to Sharia law. Christians and Jews who do not accept Mohammed as the ﬁnal prophet are Kafirs.Muslims pray five times a day and the opening prayer always includes:Koran 1: 7 Not the path of those who anger You [the Jews] nor the path of those who go astray [the Christians].LANGUAGESince the original Arabic word for unbelievers was Kafir and that is the actual word used in the Koran and Sharia law, that is the word used here for accuracy and precision.It is very simple: if you don’t believe Mohammed and his Koran, you are a Kafir.</comment>

<comment>even if one verse says that its enuff</comment>

<comment>Please quote a verse.</comment>

<comment>i have no desire to read your book... But it is a known fact ,your holy book says to kill kafirs ..does it not ?</comment>

<comment>Chapter 9, verse 6:- And if anyone of the Mushrikun (polytheists, idolaters, pagans, disbelievers in the Oneness of Allah) seeks your protection then grant him protection, so that he may hear the Word of Allah (the Qur'an), and then escort him to where he can be secure, that is because they are men who know not.The Messenger of Allah, peace and blessings be upon him, said, “Those who are merciful will be shown mercy by the Most Merciful. Be merciful to those on the earth(humans,animals,trees,any living thing) and the One above the heavens will have mercy upon you. The womb is derived from the Most Merciful, thus whoever keeps relations with his family then Allah will keep relations with him, and whoever abandons his family then Allah will abandon him.”</comment>

<comment>Well this one is good,  but put your hand on your heart and say there is no verse asking to kill the infidel ???</comment>

<comment>Buddy, That's what I am saying to you it's no where written to kill without any reason. If someone says us that Islam says to kill it's wrong, we are allowed only when we are harmed first and killing is prescribed only when it is the only solution.People read completly out of context and cherry pick the verses for their gain like what terroist organisations does, their leaders quote verses where as they are not even half educated in Islam. These Guys want power,money and to meet their goals they are killing.THis is the biggest tragedy for 1.6 Billion muslims, the Grand Mufti (Scholar of Scholars) said that killing innocents is HARAM hundereds of Mufti's around the world condemned it but people,media dont highlight their views. But highlight the views of some scumbag terrorist who don't even know Quran never read it fully.All know leaders of Terrorist Organisations are mildly educated in Islam just having a beard don't make you a perfect muslim.If you want to know about Quran,Just read the views of Schloars.If you want the names I will suggest don't want to impose on you without your permission.</comment>

<comment>Same with you guys for RSS</comment>

<comment>well the Gita says its ok to kill too.</comment>

<comment>where ? please elaborate? Fighting on the side of Dharm and killing people who are not of your faith are too different things in tone and tenor mullaji</comment>

<comment>St.Stephens needs principal.....Catch....only Christians eligible.</comment>

<comment>RSS needs a new chief.Catch......only Brahmins eligible.</comment>

<comment>Sunni muslims = terrorists.Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>Was there beef in the refrigerator?</comment>

<comment>I think these RSS leaders need Jihadi John treatment.</comment>

<comment>i think a pig should screw u r mother</comment>

<comment>.</comment>

<comment>pedophile worshipper</comment>

<comment>eat some pork meat and screw u r sister Aisha</comment>

<comment>.</comment>

<comment>Is Aisha's ch00t pink or red?</comment>

<comment>.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>When people like you Jasman who spread hatred against Hindus thinking that Indians are stupid...well may be Paki are...and they will listen to your mullah but Indians in this DNAge knows what you are doing here.Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>AZAM KHAN .. :)</comment>

<comment>madarrrchod India is an independent nation u Pedophile worshipper</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>u look like a wh0rre's son to me</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>International community is trying very hard to wipe out terrorism by muslims which is 99.9999% spread by muslims. ISIS, Taliban, Al Quieda...does not matter how many they try to destroy they keep coming back since they have 4 wives and many more...remember Osama...he had multiple wives. Remember Dawood...off course multiple wives. Remember any muslim and he will have multiple wives and dozen children from each who are ready to blow themselves to get 72 whores in hell.</comment>

<comment>What happened of the rape culprits in Delhi?</comment>

<comment>this is just sickular mischief by IE don't aQuote those wretched sickular mofusGo online and check the original article yourself. It is being distorted by sickular</comment>

<comment>do RSS chaddis wear real chaddis?</comment>

<comment>Dadri incident was mob violence issue(hence Law&Order of State). Media successfully spun it into the ideological issue of cow.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>FYI Last month also in Dadri..3 cattle thieves were beaten to death. MSM didn't take it coz couldn't connect it to 'Beef' N THIEVES where not muslims..</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>only one day.. it was reported as victim was non muslim.. Muslim victim is important for sickular image... preaching for shana banu n personal law board are illogical in modern India...</comment>

<comment>If it is so then why RSS is quoting Vedas to justify killing. And cow is not ideological issue, it is religious issue.</comment>

<comment>u should read the full original article n the context in which it was said  Vedas order killing of sinners.... MSM AGAIN MISQUOTING.... it is again a hit n run case to defame RSS</comment>

<comment>RSS distancing itself from the article saying it's not their view. If there is nothing wrong in the article why they are not defending it which is published in RSS magazine?As a citizen let us criticize any wrong doing cutting across all political parties.</comment>

<comment>expectation from bjp supporters are that these rotor mouth leaders shall be dropped from the squad and can be replaced by a very qualified service minded people. for the avid bjp supporters, it gives a feeling that, only a handful of ministers are in action even though the pmo is in full control. modi must have a ranking system for those leaders and let known the appraisal process to the public. non performing ministers shall be shaked to give a stern warning to your collagues that no inaction shall be tollerated.bjp created a good impression on india within inside and outside, but there is a belief that it is all because of low oil price. so, it is high time for the leaders to think and take full advantage of the low oil price to steer the country into development path.modi is capable of doing this; in my undestanding, he needs to be little more proactive.hope, bihar results will instill a lot of confident in the coming days. all the best to bjp team!</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>spammer arup</comment>

<comment>whats spamming in stating truth</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>why RSS chaddis dont love jersey cows, black coloured cows, spotted cows? why so much fascination for white cows?</comment>

<comment>Muslims love for gorgeous voluptuous 72 whores in hell is evident as 95% of all suicide bombers are muslims.Anti-Hindu = ALL MUSLIMS trying to restore Sunni Muslim Monopoly. 99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>99.9999% terror attacks from muslims. Go figure who is intolerant here.</comment>

<comment>why RSS chaddis cant take care of stray cows?</comment>

<comment>Why muslims cannot take care of their 4 stray wives and 48 stray children from them?</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Dear Modi apologist,Even dictators can claim to work for 18-19 hours a day, travel without rest, etc. As an elected PM, he is allowing his ministers, MPs and his alma mater (RSS) to get away with hate speech after hate speech day after day. Any amount of jan dhan in our banks won't wash.</comment>

<comment>Quran is the mother of hate speech</comment>

<comment>Now the RSS is openly advocating murder. Still Bakths are cheering on the sides. Interesting.</comment>

<comment>Danish cartoon, Satanic Versus ring a bell?</comment>

<comment>I didn't cheer that, did you?</comment>

<comment>What about outcry like you do now? Why can't be an intolerant secular then when free speech is affected, not sure if you had any wards then to return back to the then Congress Government, why hypocrisy now is the only question ?</comment>

<comment>The government is actively backing all forms of intolerance. That is the crucial difference. I don't remember UPA ministers making such remarks.</comment>

<comment>UPA ministers allowed you to have multiple wives and pamper you for your votes.</comment>

<comment>gujaratis also consume non veg</comment>

<comment>Muslims also consume pork.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Forget this list. The quran itself advocates killing of idol worshippers ie Hindus.</comment>

<comment>RSS should leave Beef and target things like  Muslim personal law, that's sheer inequality</comment>

<comment>99.9995 of terrorist activities are done by Muslims. 95% of suicide bombers are Muslims. How far will this religion of peace and equality will go to spread terror?4 Sunni Muslim Groups Responsible for 66% of All 17,958 Terror Killings in 2013 - By Patrick Goodenough | November 19, 2014 | 4:38 AM ESTEighty-two percent of fatalities occurred in just five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria, although the number of countries that experienced more than 50 terror-related deaths also rose – to 24, compared with 15 the previous year.As a driver for terrorist groups, Islam as a religion far outstrips “politics.” In 2013, 60 percent of all terrorist attacks occurred in five countries – Iraq, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Nigeria and Syria. However the rest of the world also suffered a 54 percent increase in terrorist incidents in 2013. (Graph: Global Terrorism Index)“Over the last decade the increase in terrorism has been linked to radical Islamic groups whose violent theologies have been broadly taught,” said Steve Killelea, executive chairman of the Institute for Economics and Peace.Four Sunni muslim groups were responsible for 66 percent of all terror fatalities in 2013. In order of deadliness, they were the Taliban in Afghanistan and its Tehrik-e-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) affiliate in neighboring Pakistan; al-Qaeda and its various affiliates; ISIS and its al-Qaeda in Iraq (AQI) precursor; and Boko Haram in Nigeria.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>RSS needs to set it's house in order no doubt</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Fascist are even better than muslims. Muslims only know one thing. To kill and to blow themselves for 72 whores.</comment>

<comment>"Vedas order killing of the sinner who kills a cow."Yeah, right. Let's replace the Constitution with the Vedas. This is fascism with a distinct Hindutva flavour</comment>

<comment>We already replaced the Constitution with Islamic flavor where we give more rights to muslims, they dont need to follow Indian Constitution, we give more rights to muslim majority state of J&K, we pay for their trips to their jihadiland Mecca for their Hajj, we allow them to create noise pollution daily in Arabic and we allow them to control smuggling, we have outsourced terrorism to Muslims and eventually we will be again divided once they are in majority just like in 1947 when they took their majority land.</comment>

<comment>"Vedas order killing of the sinner who kills a cow."Ramayana orders monkeys should burn their tails and jump across to Lanka.</comment>

<comment>??</comment>

<comment>Sure, and that's why we have a Constitution and we don't follow green or saffron books. Until now</comment>

<comment>But soon we will  be following green book .</comment>

<comment>You mean to say Green book of satanic verses = Koran?</comment>

<comment>"Vedas order killing of the sinner who kills a cow."Lol!</comment>

<comment>64% OF KORAN TALKS ILL AND KILLING AND VIOLENCE.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Hindus. You are becoming intolerant now. Answer: Why you never questioned when Indian Constitution allowed only one wife to one man but had exception for muslims who can have multiple wives. Why didn't you question when pundits were massacred in muslim majority state of J&K. Why you didnt question when a hindu cannot buy a land in J&K but a muslim from J&K can buy a land anywhere. Why you didnt question when muslims were paid by tax payers to go to their holyland mecca on Haj thousands of crores of rupees. Why you didnt question when muslims were pampered and allowed to dominate Bollywood, media, and were blue eyed children. Now why are you treating all Indians same including muslims. That is intolerance.</comment>

<comment>Modiji ki khaaki chaddi dheere dheere utar rahi hai.</comment>

<comment>today we think is holiday for rsss disciples a.k.a. bhakt trolls. they are available only during weekdays in two shifts.</comment>

<comment>Once again, I proved Chaddis are the real hypocrites in this country.Chaddis criticized Justice Kurian Joseph when he skipped the meet organized by CJI including PM and said that religion should be next and work to be first.Now, they conveniently say that Modi ji cancelled the rallies as he is on Navratri fast.Shame on Khaki Chaddi Terrorists.</comment>

<comment>so did kurien not attend the meeting to celebrate the birth of say a fatherless so called prophet ! anyway ur prophet's bhakra father's shrine is burnt in Israel why don;t you concentrate on that</comment>

<comment>Equating a govt duty to a political party duty....you panties have simply lost it</comment>

<comment>panties where ? though they wore nothing under the white frocks</comment>

<comment>You won't be a government with out doing the political party duty. Please don't try your Chaddi logic with me.</comment>

<comment>I know logic doesn't work with panty morons</comment>

<comment>See, the tongue can waggle as one wants and Sanghi Morons always have 56 inch tongue !!</comment>

<comment>Well Said Sir. Absolutely true.</comment>

<comment>But Feku was addressing a meeting on RTI where he is the worst sinner as the Central Government headed by him has not responded to the RTI filed by his own wife Jasodha Ben on her security apprehensions !!</comment>

<comment>hardly a national issue , mate , unlike lets say where nehru sent a leader to gulag because he could have been a threat to his family and bunch of commies- FB( forward bloc) hardly raised the issue , thats more serious than a couple living separately</comment>

<comment>Yes panty boy</comment>

<comment>Thank your admitting the facts.</comment>

<comment>Admitting lol?</comment>

<comment>No?</comment>

<comment>hope hardicckkk patell has also been banned today after mobile internet in rajkot.  we should not interrupt south africa ODI and hurt India's image at world stage.</comment>

<comment>indians should stop kicking and screaming and live with the consequences of 2014 election voting.  accept rsss rule and obey and work toward hindutva nation building.  why argue?? even modii has to give progress report and annual presentation to bhagwatt!!</comment>

<comment>Soon we will have vedic version of circumcisions, polygamy and burkas in Hindu religion.</comment>

<comment>Have you noticed that no bhakt ever makes fun of polygamy?</comment>

<comment>Yes, you are right! Forget the bajrangdal or Sena gangs why didn't Sadhvi ever bring it up? Why this selective outrage by the chaddi gang. </comment>

<comment>The idea of polygamy in Hinduism would literally make them wet their chaddis.</comment>

<comment>hahahahahaha well said well said, although given their penchant for holding hands and groping each other I would have thought they were leaning towards the other side of things</comment>

<comment>we heard brahmins used to eat beef lustily before advent of buddhism.  is it true they stopped and instituted a vegan diet to compete with growing popularity of buddhism??</comment>

<comment>You heard wring</comment>

<comment>You heard wrong</comment>

<comment>indians, why are you arguing??  try to learn from your master rsss gurus.  we also have few qs maybe bhaktss can help us understand.</comment>

<comment>it is very instructive to learn hindutva culture from the gurus at rsss.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>This is 21st Century bhai !!</comment>

<comment>"There is no Beef in Vedas "</comment>

<comment>So what do you want me to do? There is no restriction of food on Vedas, correct?</comment>

<comment>When the times comes.. definitely i will ask for a favor ;)</comment>

<comment>Your favor won't interfere in my food, correct?</comment>

<comment>correct :)</comment>

<comment>But cow and bull slaughter is present in abundance !!</comment>

<comment>do YOU READ VEDAS.. </comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

